
Goliath Film and Media Holdings (GFMH.PK)  Quote| Reuters.com




























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Goliath Film and Media Holdings (GFMH.PK)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataEntertainment Production












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        










				GFMH.PK on OTC Markets Group


				0.00USD
--





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    --


					            (--)
					        






Prev Close

$0.00


Open

--




Day's High

--


Day's Low

--




Volume

--


Avg. Vol

46,367




52-wk High

$0.01


52-wk Low

$0.00










GFMH.PK








					About


		Goliath Film and Media Holdings is engaged in the production and distribution of motion pictures and television content. The Company, through its subsidiaries, Goliath Film and Media International, and Goliath Movie Partners 1, LLC, develops, produces and licenses digital content for distribution. The Company focuses on markets... (more)





					Buy/Sell



No analyst recommendations are available for GFMH.PK.

» Analyst Consensus





					Overall





Beta:
-0.42


Market Cap(Mil.):
$0.79


Shares Outstanding(Mil.):
174.63


Dividend:
--


Yield (%):
--








					Financials





 
GFMH.PK
Industry
Sector


P/E (TTM):

				3.41

				67.77

				19.83


EPS (TTM):

				0.00

				--

				--


ROI:

				63.80

				-1.44

				10.94


ROE:

				126.41

				-0.89

				13.56












					Latest News about GFMH.PK




» More GFMH.PK News











 Earnings vs.  Estimates


		No consensus analysis data available.

















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataEntertainment Production




















Goliath Film and Media Holdings: OTCMKTS:GFMH quotes & news - Google FinanceMy AccountSearchMapsYouTubePlayGmailDriveCalendarGoogle+TranslatePhotosMoreDocsBloggerContactsHangoutsKeepEven more from GoogleSign inHidden fieldsSearch FinanceAdobe Flash Player is required for interactive charts. AllowFinanceGoliath Film and Media Holdings(OTCMKTS:GFMH)Add to portfolioCompanySummaryNewsRelated companiesHistorical pricesFinancialsMarketsNewsPortfoliosStock screenerGoogle Domestic TrendsRecent Quotes (30 days)You have no recent quoteschg | %




Goliath Film and Media Holdings  (Public, OTCMKTS:GFMH)  
Watch this stock
 




















0.00450


0.00000
(0.00%)





Delayed:
 

11:56AM EDT



OTCMKTS
data delayed by 15 mins -
Disclaimer

Currency in USD







Range

    -



52 week

0.00 - 0.01



Open

    -



Vol / Avg.

0.00/1,439.00



Mkt cap

785,810.00



P/E

3.41



Div/yield

    -



EPS

0.00



Shares

174.63M



Beta

2.31



Inst. own

    -
































News





Relevance



Date











All news for Goliath Film and Media Holdings »

Subscribe






Advertisement


Key stats and ratios




Q1 (Jan '17)
2016


Net profit margin
-
19.69%

Operating margin
-
20.45%

EBITD margin
-
20.45%

Return on average assets
-16.92%
19.28%

Return on average equity
-19.42%
45.97%

Employees
3
-

CDP Score
-

-



More ratios from Thomson Reuters »

Address
640 S San Vicente BlvdLOS ANGELES, CA 90048-4654United States
- Map+1-213-5375730 (Phone)

Website links


http://www.goliathfilmandmediainter...

















Settings |
Technicals |



Link to this view





Sources include SIX.




















Advertisement







Related companies





Show:


Most Recent Quarter


Most Recent Annual




Add or remove columns
Save changes
Cancel









More from FactSet »










Description




Goliath Film and Media Holdings is engaged in the production and distribution of motion pictures and television content. The Company, through its subsidiaries, Goliath Film and Media International, and Goliath Movie Partners 1, LLC, develops, produces and licenses digital content for distribution. The Company focuses on markets of the feature motion picture and television content segments of the entertainment industry, including education, faith-based, horror and socially responsible minority content. The Company will develop screenplays that are outsourced to an independent entity for production and licensed for distribution through it. It will also produce content that is tied to working with a distributor. The Company focuses on producing content, and distributing domestically and internationally, through a range of distribution network, which includes international theatrical exhibitors, and other distributors and television networks.


More from Reuters »












Google Finance Beta available in: Hong Kong - Canada - U.S. - China - U.K.Information is provided "as is" and solely for informational purposes, not for trading purposes or advice, and may be delayed.To see all exchange delays, please  see disclaimer.©2017 Google - Google Home - Blog - Help - Report a Problem - Privacy Policy - Terms of Service



Goliath Film & Media Holdings 4640 Admiralty Way Marina Del Rey, CA Audio-Visual Production Service - MapQuest







































































































    Goliath Film & Media Holdings
  

4640 Admiralty Way

Marina Del Rey
CA
90292




 Reviews



(909) 612-1708
Website

        Menu & Reservations
      



            Make Reservations 




            Order Online
          

            Tickets
          




          Tickets
        


        See Availability
      





      Nearby
    


      Directions
    


    {{::location.tagLine.value.text}}
  



Sponsored Topics








































See a problem?
Let us know!






















Legal






Help























10-Q: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS - MarketWatch



























































Latest News










Dow

22,016
+0.17
+0.00%






Nasdaq

6,345
-17.59
-0.28%






S&P 500

2,472
-5.38
-0.22%









11:41 A.M. ET


                                  Dow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
                                





 
11:33 A.M. ET


Updated
      Treasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


Updated
      Oil prices rise as investors focus on U.S. data
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


                                  Good news: Employees are starting to get serious about saving for retirement 
                                





 
11:29 A.M. ET


                                  Square stock price target raised to $26 from $18 at Canaccord Genuity
                                





 
11:27 A.M. ET


                                  Trump’s long vacation is needed to stop leaks to the White House press
                                





 
11:16 A.M. ET


                                  GM's Chevy Bolt beats Tesla's Model S in Consumer Reports' range test
                                





 
11:12 A.M. ET


Updated
      Teva shares plummet 18% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
                                





 
11:10 A.M. ET


                                  Does your kid really want a $200 stuffed giraffe?
                                





 
11:11 A.M. ET


                                  Dovish or hawkish? Bank of England leaves traders confused after ‘Super Thursday’
                                





 
11:03 A.M. ET


                                  Documentary Clip: 'Icarus'
                                





 
11:10 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s proof the average U.S. household isn’t the ‘dumb money’
                                





 
11:08 A.M. ET


Updated
      Tesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
                                





 
11:06 A.M. ET


                                  Voters golfing with President Trump? That was one Scaramucci idea before his exit
                                





 
11:05 A.M. ET


                                  Snap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversay
                                





 
11:05 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory price target cut to $44 from $50 at Instinet
                                





 
11:04 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory shares down 3.6% in Thursday trading
                                





 
11:03 A.M. ET


                                  Cheesecake Factory price target cut to $50 from $60 at Canaccord Genuity
                                





 
10:59 A.M. ET


Updated
      AmerisourceBergen stock plummets 9% alongside other companies affected by negative generic price trends
                                





 
10:48 A.M. ET


                                  Meet this Trump addict whose ONE job is to offer bets on the Donald’s presidency
                                





 








































Log In
























Home






Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




Get email alerts



         10-Q: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS
    








    By

Published: Feb 27, 2017 2:40 p.m. ET

Share






















































 



 















(EDGAR Online via COMTEX) -- Item 2. Management's Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of Operations.  Forward Looking Statement Notice  Certain statements made in this Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q are "forward-looking statements" (within the meaning of the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995) regarding the plans and objectives of management for future operations. Such statements involve known and unknown risks, uncertainties and other factors that may cause actual results, performance or achievements of Goliath Film and Media Holdings, ("we", "us", "our" or the "Company") to be materially different from any future results, performance or achievements expressed or implied by such forward-looking statements. The forward-looking statements included herein are based on current expectations that involve numerous risks and uncertainties. The Company's plans and objectives are based, in part, on assumptions involving the continued expansion of business. Assumptions relating to the foregoing involve judgments with respect to, among other things, future economic, competitive and market conditions and future business decisions, all of which are difficult or impossible to predict accurately and many of which are beyond the control of the Company. Although the Company believes its assumptions underlying the forward-looking statements are reasonable, any of the assumptions could prove inaccurate and, therefore, there can be no assurance the forward-looking statements included in this Quarterly Report will prove to be accurate. In light of the significant uncertainties inherent in the forward-looking statements included herein, the inclusion of such information should not be regarded as a representation by the Company or any other person that the objectives and plans of the Company will be achieved.  Description of Business  Background  The Company was incorporated in Nevada on February 16, 2010 under the name "China Advanced Technology" as the successor by merger to Vitalcare Diabetes Treatment Centers, Inc. ("Vitalcare"). In February and March 2010, Vitalcare underwent a holding company reorganization under Delaware law, pursuant to which it became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Vitalcare Holding Corporation, and Vitalcare, together with its assets and liabilities, was sold to a non-affiliated third party. Vitalcare Holding Corporation subsequently reincorporated in Nevada by merger into China Advanced.  Vitalcare was in the business of administering medical clinics specializing in diabetes treatment. It was the successor to Network Financial Services, Inc. ("Network"), which went public in an underwritten offering in 1987. Network was engaged in mortgage origination, and changed its name to Westmark Group Holdings ("Westmark") in 1993 in connection with the acquisition of Westmark Mortgage from Primark Corporation. Westmark ceased operations at some time in 2006, and in 2006 ceased filing reports under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The corporate entity was thereafter known as Viking Consolidated, Inc. (2006), Tailor Aquaponics World Wide, Inc. (2007) and Diversified Acquisitions (2007) until it entered the medical clinic business in early 2008. The Company has no information regarding any business activities from 2006 after the mortgage origination business closed, to early 2008.  On October 25, 2011, Goliath Film and Media International, a California corporation, entered into an Agreement and Plan of Reorganization (the "Exchange Agreement"), pursuant to which Goliath Film and Media International was acquired by China Advanced Technology. Prior to the acquisition, our principal operations consisted of internet marketing, and were conducted through a wholly owned subsidiary, Live Wise, Inc. Live Wise was disposed of on October 31, 2011 for cancellation of debt and shares described below. At the Closing Date, there were no assets or liabilities on China Advanced Technology's balance sheets.  The transaction closed on October 31, 2011 (the "Closing Date"). On the Closing Date China Advanced Technology acquired Goliath Film and Media International by issuing 47,000,000 shares of its Common Stock, constituting 70.1% of the outstanding shares after giving effect to their issuance and the cancellation of 15,619,816 shares held by China Advanced Technology's prior control person. Immediately following the Closing, 67,100,000 shares were issued and outstanding. On the Closing Date, the name of China Advanced Technology was changed to Goliath Film and Media Holdings. All share numbers herein have been adjusted for an eight-for-1 forward stock split affected as of the Closing Date. The forward stock split was reflected in the trading market on February 13, 2012.  Overview  Goliath Film and Media Holdings, through its wholly-owned subsidiaries Goliath Film and Media International and Goliath Movie Partners 1, LLC (collectively, "Goliath" or the "Company"), develops, produces and licenses for distribution, domestically and internationally, quality digital content with an emphasis on "niche" markets of the feature motion picture and television content segments of the entertainment industry, such as, without limitation, education, faith-based, horror and socially responsible minority content. Goliath does not intend to engage in domestic theatrical distribution of motion pictures to any significant extent.  In qualified cases, Goliath will develop screenplays that will be outsourced to an independent entity for production, but will be licensed for distribution through the Company. Also, in certain cases Goliath will produce content that is tied to working with an established distributor that provides an advance or minimum guarantee for the production of a project that will be licensed by the participating distributor. Goliath plans to produce content and to distribute domestically and internationally, through a wide distribution network which includes major international theatrical exhibitors, and other distributors and television networks. We plan to utilize corporate sponsorships as a means of reducing the costs of advertising and marketing in distribution. Further, we may augment our marketing efforts with a limited and strategically focused advertising campaign in traditional "print" media with press releases targeted specifically toward standard entertainment industry trade journals and publications on an "as needed" basis as well as the inclusion of targeted "social media" campaigns.  Goliath's revenue model includes receiving revenue from distribution fees. A limited number of its content properties include projects developed and produced by Goliath and those produced by an independent third party production entity.  Questions and Answers  What is your business?  We develop, produce and distribute motion pictures and digital content. At this time we do not intend to engage in theatrical releases of motion pictures, due to the high up- front costs of advertising and marketing theatrically. However, in some specific cases the company will consider theatrical releases based upon a "four wall, " limited release delivery that will be focused on targeted niche audiences.  Distribution Rights  The Company has the following distribution rights:  On March 9, 2015 Goliath signed a non-exclusive license to sell the feature length motion pictures: "Farewell", "Buddies" and "The Pit." The term is for one year expiring on March 9, 2016 with compensation to Goliath of 25% of gross proceeds from the sales of each of these films. No revenue has been recognized to date.  1. On October 22, 2014 Goliath entered into an agreement to distribute all foreign rights for the motion picture "Virus X," "Film" starring Sybil Danning with some of the key terms as follows:  2. Time frame (Term) - 18 months with ability to renew at same terms for another 18 months if agreed by both parties by end of the 18 month term. Term begins October 22, 2014. As of January 31, 2017 Goliath still is working on distribution of the film, "Virus X."  3. Markets - In all foreign media known and unknown  4. Compensation to Goliath- 15% of gross proceeds on all foreign territories. Said 15% (of 100%) is inclusive and includes, but not limited to, all payments, fees and reimbursements of any and all kinds made and/or incurred by Goliath through the exploitation of the Film. No revenue has been recognized to date.  5. Renewals - when the contract is renewed by a particular territory, Goliath will be the entity of record to effectuate the renewals, yet only after notification is made to and approved verbally or written by Empire Films.  On October 29, 2014, Goliath entered into a Distribution and Sales Agreement with EMILIO ROSO ("Producer") granting all domestic and foreign distribution rights, excluding digital streaming for the motion pictures "Day of Redemption," "On Borrowed Time" and "Tumbleweed," with some of the major terms as follows:  Time frame (Term) - 18 months. Term began October 29, 2014. Goliath is still is the process of distributing these films.  1. Markets - In all domestic and foreign media known and unknown and all domestic and foreign territories.  2. Compensation to Goliath - 25% of gross proceeds on all domestic and foreign territories, except digital streaming. Said 25% (of 100%) is inclusive and includes, but not limited to, all payments, fees and reimbursements of any and all kinds made and/or incurred by Goliath through the exploitation of the motion pictures. No revenue has been recognized to date.  On February 13, 2012 the Company announced that it has acquired the distribution rights to the following motion pictures: Seducing Spirits, The Perfect Argument, Marina Murders, Film Struggle, Divorce in America, A Wonderful Summer, The Truth About Layla, Living with Cancer, and The Biggest Fan. Under the distribution agreements, Goliath will receive 30% of the gross revenues for each picture it distributes. In general, the Company's distribution contracts cover both domestic and international licensing agreements; however, for the picture The Biggest Fan, the Company obtained limited distribution rights. No revenue has been recognized to date.  Production Agreements  On March 4, 2016, we signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion picture currently in post-production by us. Per the agreement, we will receive $125,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture "Bridal Bootcamp" a romantic comedy movie being produced by us to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC will receive 35% of the gross proceeds for a period of 25 years on the motion picture. As of October 31, 2016, we have received $125,000 of the advance payments. Bridal Boot Camp was completed in October 2016 resulting in the recognition of the advance payments as revenue of $125,000 during the period. Mar Vista is looking to distribute this film.  On September 18, 2015, we signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion picture currently completed by us. Per the agreement, we will receive $125,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture "Merry Exes" a Christmas holiday movie being produced by us to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC will receive 35% of the gross proceeds for a period of 25 years on the motion picture. As of July 31, 2016, we have received $125,000 of the advance payments. Merry Exes was completed June 6, 2016 resulting in the recognition of the advance payments as revenue of $125,000 during the period. Mar Vista is looking to distribute this film.  On May 20, 2015, we signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion picture currently completed by us and being licensed by Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC. Per the agreement, we will receive $175,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture "Terror Birds" a science fiction movie produced by us to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC will receive 30% of the gross proceeds for a period of 25 years on the film. As of April 30, 2016, we have received $175,000 of the advance payments. Terror Birds was completed December 14, 2015 resulting in the recognition of the advance payments as revenue of $175,000 during the period. Mar Vista is looking to distribute this film.  On April 15, 2015 Goliath signed an agreement whereby the Company agreed to invest $15,000 to KKO Productions to produce a feature length motion picture known as "Forgiven". Per the agreement Goliath will receive 15% of adjusted gross proceeds after its initial investment has been entirely recouped through adjusted gross proceed. Additionally, the Company will receive two on screen credits as Executive Producer as well as receiving credit on all advertising, publicity and packaging of the motion picture. The investment of $15,000 presented in other assets on the balance sheet has not yet been repaid, due to the fact that no revenues will be generated until this motion picture's released.  What is the timeline for your activities during the next 12 months?  Over the next 90 days to one year, our efforts will be concentrated on developing and producing content with distributors for licensing by them of at least three projects.  What is this going to cost you?  We expect that producing the aforementioned content will cost approximately $150,000 per project, however licensing and distribution will be handled by an experienced distributor for a fee of anywhere from 30 - 35% and the costs of advertising and marketing will be handled by them and charged against gross distribution licensing proceeds.  Why are these motion pictures not being distributed already?  The motion pictures that are being produced by the Company and distributed by Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC take anywhere from six to nine months from completion of production and delivery to obtain licensing agreements.  Generically, the main reason why good, quality motion pictures are not distributed is that the production of a motion picture requires money and creativity, and marketing a motion picture requires an entirely different set of skills. Many people dream of making a movie; few aspire to distribute them. We estimate that there are in excess of 10,000 such motion pictures "gathering dust." There also have been and continue to be substantial tax incentives for motion picture production in many States and international Territories, so that many producers do not need to depend on successful marketing in order to find investors for their projects. A secondary factor is the difficulty of finding a reputable distributor. We think that our management has an excellent reputation in the industry and we will be able to obtain distribution rights for content. Finally, many distributors as well as buyers do not have an interest in niche market films, because they see the market as limited. Goliath sees the problem to be, rather, there is no market merely because no one has assembled a critical mass of films for these niches. Most participants in the motion picture industry are based in "Hollywood" and the major coastal metropolitan areas. Our "faith-based" films especially are targeted toward the "Bible Belt" and the "Flyover Country": places that the industry has consistently overlooked.  Why are you able to identify and acquire these motion pictures and educational videos?  After attending all the major content acquisition markets around the world over the last three years, our Staff has developed relationships with numerous quality filmmakers who need assistance in marketing and distributing their product. Goliath has also developed vital relationships with many of the major content distributors and networks. Many of the filmmakers have requested the Company's assistance in marketing and distributing their product. Goliath will continue to pursue the marketing and distribution of product that is demanded in the marketplace and desired by major aggregators, distributors, networks and studios.  So how are you different than Amazon, Netflix, Blockbuster and Hulu, to name a few? How can you compete with them? They have a lot of money and name recognition. Why wouldn't they jump into your niches?  As a content provider we are not competing with these entities but rather are working on providing them with quality content. As an example, NETFLIX has such a high demand for programming content, they are spending $5 billion this year for the acquisition of completed programming as well as for the development of original content by them. Therefore, as is mentioned, part of their resources are directed toward acquiring content and part is targeting in-house" and joint venture production of quality content. This content will be targeted to their subscription base on a domestic and international level.  There are a number of quality content producers that work with the major networks and content distributors, Goliath is moving toward becoming one of these content providers. We believe there exists significant opportunities for our company in that the demand for programming is increasing almost exponentially. Irrespective of the platform for viewing by the consumer/subscriber, the demand for quality content is continuing to expand. As an example there are currently, approximately 416 original scripted programs being aired in the entire television universe - a cancellation rate of 10% reflects a number that represents the entire programming universe in the late 1990's and early 2000's.. The upward trend is ongoing, which is where we see an opportunity for Goliath to provide product to reach many components of the overall market.  Don't cable and satellite networks already offer specialty channels like TBN (for faith based) and BET (Black Entertainment Television (for the African-American Community)?  As mentioned above about NETFLIX, even though these channels maybe in niche markets they must expand the type, genre and format of the content that they are showing in order to remain viable, therefore the opportunity to assist them by providing quality programming is ongoing and expanding..  What other niches are you looking at entering?  We believe that there is an increasing and ongoing trend in home entertainment in servicing niches. Many viewers have cable or satellite service with hundreds of channels, but view only a few channels that cater to their particular interests. One significant type of niche we are targeting are the numerous immigrant groups in the United States. Other than Spanish speaking immigrants, coverage is scarce. The last official data (2004) from the US Census Bureau is that 34.2 million persons in the US are foreign born, with 54% from Latin America, 25% from Asia and 14% from Europe. Foreign-born immigrants like to watch movies from their home countries.  There are many interest groups that might be interested in specialty movies or programming. As an example in Hawaii and Southern California, for instance, Surfing is quite popular, and there exists a huge body of surfing films which would be of interest.  What about ancillary markets?  We plan to incorporate advertising and marketing through social media and traditional outlets to the highest degree possible.  What films do you have now in inventory?  We presently have acquired the distribution rights to the following motion pictures: , Seducing Spirits, The Perfect Argument, Marina Murders, Film Struggle, Divorce in America, A Wonderful Summer, The Truth About Layla, Living with Cancer, The Biggest Fan, Days of Redemption, On Borrowed Time, Tumbleweed, Virus X, Farewell, Buddies, and The Pit. Under the distribution agreements Goliath will receive 30% of the gross revenues for each of the pictures we distribute. In general, our distribution contracts cover both domestic and international licensing agreements; however, for the picture The Biggest Fan we obtained limited distribution rights.  How do these distribution rights work?  We enter into a Distribution Agreement for each motion picture. Terms may be perpetual or limited by years. The motion pictures that we are acquiring with the proceeds of this offering will have a term of five years. We will generally obtain a fee of 20% to 30% of gross revenues. Licensing will be flexible for usage applications on a yearly or multi-year basis. Most markets, especially foreign territories have a tendency to continuously renew content licensing.  How many employees do you have? Do you have an office?  We have just 3 employees and we believe that is sufficient during the development, production and "content aggregation" phase of our development. Our administrative office is in Marina del Rey, California.  Do you have a website?  Our website is www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com. We have a mirror site at www.goliathfilmandmedia.com.  Critical Accounting Policies and Estimates  The SEC has defined a company's critical accounting policies as the ones that are most important to the portrayal of the Company's financial condition and results of operations and which require the Company to make its most difficult and subjective judgments, often as a result of the need to make estimates of matters that are inherently uncertain. Based on this definition, we have identified the critical accounting policies and judgments addressed below. We also have other key accounting policies that are significant to understanding our results. For additional information, see Note 2 - Summary of Significant Accounting Policies.  The following are deemed to be the most significant accounting policies affecting the Company.  Principles of Consolidation  The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All significant inter-company balances and transactions are eliminated on consolidation.  Basis of Presentation  The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reported period. Actual results could differ from those estimates. Management further acknowledges that it is solely responsible for adopting sound accounting practices, establishing and maintaining a system of internal accounting control and preventing and detecting fraud. The Company's system of internal accounting control is designed to assure, among other items, that (1) recorded transactions are valid; (2) all valid transactions are recorded and (3) transactions are recorded in the period in a timely manner to produce financial statements which present fairly the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the company for the respective periods being presented.  Use of Estimates  The preparation of financial statements in accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. A change in managements' estimates or assumptions could have a material impact on the Company's financial condition and results of operations during the period in which such changes occurred. The more significant estimates and assumptions by management include among others: Estimated revenue of films. The current economic environment has increased the degree of uncertainty inherent in these estimates and assumptions.  Actual results could differ from those estimates. The Company's financial statements reflect all adjustments that management believes are necessary for the fair presentation of their financial condition and results of operations for the periods presented.  Revenue Recognition  We recognize revenues in accordance with ASC 926-605, "Entertainment Films, Revenue Recognition".  Under ASC 926-605, five conditions must be met before revenue can be recognized:  The Company recognizes revenue when the distributor confirms to the Company that the film has been delivered to the distributor with all technical and document deliveries received, waived or deferred and the film has been entered into the distributor's rights system.  Accounts Receivable  Accounts receivable, if any are carried at the expected net realizable value. The allowance for doubtful accounts, when determined, will be based on management's assessment of the collectability of specific customer accounts and the aging of the accounts receivables. If there were a deterioration of a major customer's creditworthiness, or actual defaults were higher than historical experience, our estimates of the recoverability of the amounts due to us could be overstated, which could have a negative impact on operations.  The Company currently does not have any accounts receivable. The above accounting policies will be adopted upon the Company carrying accounts receivable.  Intangible Assets  The Company's intangible assets consist of intellectual property, principally motion pictures. The Company periodically reviews its long lived assets to ensure that their carrying value does not exceed their fair market value. There was no amortization expense or impairment for the three and six months ended October 31, 2016 and 2015.  Income Taxes  We account for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board ("FASB") Accounting Standards Codification ("ASC") No. 740, Income Taxes ("ASC 740"). Under ASC 740, deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized for the future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under ASC 740, the effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes the enactment date.  Stock Compensation  In accordance with ASC No. 718, Compensation - Stock Compensation ("ASC 718"), we measure the compensation costs of share-based compensation arrangements based on the grant-date fair value and recognize the costs in the financial statements over the period during which employees are required to provide services. Share-based compensation arrangements include stock options, restricted share plans, performance-based awards, share appreciation rights and employee share purchase plans. As such, compensation cost is measured on the date of grant at their fair value. Such compensation amounts, if any, are amortized over the respective vesting periods of the option grant. We apply this statement prospectively. Equity instruments ("instruments") issued to other than employees are recorded on the basis of the fair value of the instruments, as required by ASC 718. ASC No. 505, Equity Based Payments to Non-Employees ("ASC 505") defines the measurement date and recognition period for such instruments. In general, the measurement date is (a) when a performance commitment, as defined, is reached or (b) when the earlier of (i) the non-employee performance is complete . . .  Feb 27, 2017  (c) 1995-2017 Cybernet Data Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved 


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


Trump is right about record earnings — and these companies are getting even more profitable


We asked financial advisers: How realistic is Netflix’s new show, ‘Ozark’?


Dow fights to trade above 22,000 as stocks struggle after lackluster services report















Most Popular





Dow 22,000 means the worst is yet to come





Apple’s stock could double on the ‘mother of all artificial-intelligence projects’





Why Dow 22,000 is not good news for most Americans





3 reasons a stock-market correction is coming in late summer or early fall





What 'Flash Boys' Brad Katsuyama thinks is killing Wall Street trade




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found







































 






















MarketWatch.com Topics

























Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Topics







		Istanbul



			Brexit




		Guns







		Millennials




		Immigration



			Apple

/conga/topics/main.html
369880



Subjects in the news



Sales


Steel and Iron


Taxes


Earnings


Health Care


Banks and Banking




Credit


Ice


Markets


Politics and Government


Production


Gas Prices




Russia


Oil


U.S. Politics


Europe


London Markets


Architecture






People in the news



Li Ka-Shing


Musk, Elon


Trump, Donald


Buffett, Warren


David, George


George, David




Greenspan, Alan


Wilson, Michael


Gold, Howard


Hussein


Cook, Tim


Dauman, Philippe




Clarke, Andrew


Gates, Bill


Miles, David


Rodriguez, Alex


Disney, Walt


Martin, John






Companies in the news



Clorox Co.


Aetna Inc.


Performance


New York Mercantile Exchange


United Health Services


University Health Services




The Irvine


Capital One Financial


Communications Workers of America


Best Buy Co. Inc.


Kraft Foods Inc


Staples Inc.




Wal-Mart Stores


Whole Foods Market


Travel


Morgan Stanley


Facebook


International Data Group






Organizations in the news



American Petroleum Institute


OPEC


Securities and Exchange Commission


University of California


University of Pennsylvania


University of Southern California




University of Washington


Washington University


Bank of England


European Union


Nasdaq Stock Market


World Bank




Congress


University of Michigan


World Health Organization


Federal Reserve Bank of New York


Federal Reserve Board


European Central Bank












Browse topics:


A


B


C


D


E


F


G


H


I


J


K


L


M


N


O


P


Q


R


S


T


U


V


W


X


Y


Z


0-9





















Log In




11:43 AM EDT
August 3, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:41aDow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
11:33aTreasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
11:29aSquare stock price target raised to $26 from $18 at Canaccord Genuity
11:29aOil prices rise as investors focus on U.S. data
11:29aGood news: Employees are starting to get serious about saving for retirement 
11:27aTrump’s long vacation is needed to stop leaks to the White House press
11:17aGM's Chevy Bolt beats Tesla's Model S in Consumer Reports' range test
11:12aTeva shares plummet 18% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
11:11aDovish or hawkish? Bank of England leaves traders confused after ‘Super Thursday’
11:11aHere’s proof the average U.S. household isn’t the ‘dumb money’
11:10aDoes your kid really want a $200 stuffed giraffe?
11:08aTesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
11:07aVoters golfing with President Trump? That was one Scaramucci idea before his exit
11:05aSnap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversay
11:05aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $44 from $50 at Instinet
11:04aCheesecake Factory shares down 3.6% in Thursday trading
11:03aDocumentary Clip: 'Icarus'
11:03aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $50 from $60 at Canaccord Genuity
10:59aAmerisourceBergen stock plummets 9% alongside other companies affected by negative generic price trends
10:48aMeet this Trump addict whose ONE job is to offer bets on the Donald’s presidency
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
22,016.62

+0.38
+0.00%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,345.16

-17.48
-0.27%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.22

-5.35
-0.22%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





































































 



 Goliath Film and Media Holdings announces streaming site to be launched 
         










    










 






 











 









Goliath Film and Media Holdings announces streaming site to be launched

Apr 26, 2012, 17:59 ET
		  		  						
						 from   Goliath Film and Media Holdings 











 
















































 

 




















 


LOS ANGELES, April 26, 2012 /PRNewswire/ -- Goliath Film and Media Holdings (OTC Bulletin Board:   GFMH) announces that it plans to go online with its streaming site in May 2012. The Company's recently acquired 1500 educational videos will then be available to school districts, private schools and international licensees.  Yesterday, the Company announced that NBA legend AC Green has been appointed as director of the Company's Educational Division.  Having the educational videos online will facilitate immediate sales and revenues for the Company. 
In addition, the Company's existing feature motion picture film library, as well as other properties being acquired, will also be available online commencing in May. Goliath is formulating at this time the parameters of its subscription program. Its competitor Netflix offers a $7.99 per month plan; Amazon Prime (with about 5,000 films) costs $79 per year, or about $6.58 a month.  Goliath plans to fill the niche markets of faith based, education, responsible minority content, and budget horror, and plans in the next few months to add hundreds of feature motion pictures, and thousands in the next 12 to 18 months.  Goliath intends to offer an introductory subscription price much lower than its competitors in order to attract subscribers. 
About Goliath Film and Media
Goliath Film and Media Holdings ("Goliath"), through its wholly-owned subsidiary Goliath Film and Media International, intends to develop and distribute film content with an emphasis on "niche" markets of the entertainment industry, such as, without limitation, education, horror, faith-based, and socially responsible minority content.  Goliath will specialize in licensing quality films. Goliath also intends to develop screenplays with the intent of outsourcing the production, and locking in the distribution rights to the films produced through the Company's development efforts. Goliath plans to license films domestically and internationally, through a wide distribution network that includes major exhibitors, distributors and television networks. Our website is www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com.
Safe Harbor                           
This News Release may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Although the Company believes that the expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are reasonable, it can give no assurance that such expectations will prove correct. 
 
 
 
 SOURCE  Goliath Film and Media Holdings  




  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Oct 09, 2012, 16:05 ET
Preview: Goliath Acquires Catalog of Faith Based Films













Apr 25, 2012, 16:15 ET
Preview: Goliath Film and Media Holdings announces appointment of NBA legend AC Green to head Educational Division






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 




















 



 Goliath Film and Media Holdings Releases Details Regarding Seducing Spirits 
         










    










 






 











 









Goliath Film and Media Holdings Releases Details Regarding Seducing Spirits

Mar 06, 2012, 19:10 ET
		  		  						
						 from   Goliath Film and Media Holdings 











 
















































 

 




















 


Goliath Film and Media
Goliath Film and Media Holdings ("Goliath"), through its wholly-owned subsidiary Goliath Film and Media International, intends to develop and distribute film content with an emphasis on  "niche" markets of the entertainment industry, such as, without limitation, education, horror, faith-based, and socially responsible minority content.  Goliath will specialize in developing and licensing quality films for distribution. Goliath also intends to develop screenplays with the intent of outsourcing the production, and locking in the distribution of the films developed. Goliath plans to license films domestically and internationally, through a wide distribution network to include major exhibitors, distributors and television networks. Our website is www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com.
Safe Harbor                           
This News Release may contain "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. Although the Company believes that the expectations reflected in such forward-looking statements are reasonable, it can give no assurance that such expectations will prove correct. 

 
 
 
 
 
 SOURCE  Goliath Film and Media Holdings  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Mar 08, 2012, 20:26 ET
Preview: Goliath Film and Media Holdings Releases Details Regarding The Perfect Argument.













Feb 13, 2012, 16:38 ET
Preview: Goliath Film and Media Holdings Announces the Distribution Rights to Nine Motion Pictures






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 
  GFMHE Stock Quote - Goliath Film & Media Holdings - Bloomberg Markets                     



     Error: Could not add to watchlist. X   + Watchlist  Goliath Film & Media Holdings   GFMHE:US      Ticker Change   GFMHE:US has changed to a new ticker symbol   USD             Volume   0                  


                Before it's here, it's on the Bloomberg Terminal.
            

                Learn More
            

         Volume   0    Current P/E Ratio (TTM)   -    Earnings per Share (USD) (TTM)   -    Market Cap (USD)   -    Shares Outstanding   -    Price/Sales (TTM)   -    Dividend Indicated Gross Yield   -        Sector Consumer Discretionary   % Price Change -0.02%     Industry Media   % Price Change +0.01%                    Related Videos  There are currently no related videos for this ticker. Please check back later.    Company News Press Releases   There are currently no news stories for this ticker. Please check back later.    There are currently no press releases for this ticker. Please check back later.      Profile   Goliath Film and Media Holdings develops, produces and distributes feature-length motion pictures.  The Company distributes films that include strong minorities and cater to educational, faith-based and other niche markets, produces low budget films that capitalize on new technologies, and distributes independent films.    Address  4640 Admiralty WaySuite 500Marina Del Rey, CA 90292United States   Phone  1-909-612-1708   Website   www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com     Executives Board Members    Lamont Roberts  Chief Executive Officer    Mike Criscione  COO/Director:Marketing    John Ballard  Chief Financial Officer     Show More         







Equities, ETF and Funds prices, indices and stock quotes - FT.com

















Subscribe


Sign In








Menu


Search




Financial Times




myFT










Search the FT


					Search
				






Search the FT


					Search
				

Close









MarketsMarkets DataSearch







Financial TimesCloseSearch theFTSearch

Search


Search for a securityName or partial nameCountryAll countriesArgentinaAustraliaBelgiumBrazilCanadaCayman IslandsChileChinaCzech RepublicDenmarkFinlandFranceGermanyGreeceGuernseyHong KongHungaryIcelandIndiaIndonesiaIrelandIsle of ManIsraelItalyJapanMalaysiaMexicoNetherlandsNew ZealandNorwayPolandPortugalRussiaSingaporeSouth AfricaSouth KoreaSpainSwedenSwitzerlandTaiwanThailandTurkeyUnited Arab EmiratesUnited KingdomUnited StatesSecurity typeAll typesEquitiesETFsFundsIndicesSearchThere were no results found for GFMH:PKC among equities. 
FT Lexicon{0}{0}{2}{0}{0}{2}For more information, visit the FT LexiconLexicon on this pageExplore our toolsAlertsData archivePortfolioWorld marketsEquities screenerFunds overview



 © Thomson Reuters Click for restrictions
All markets data located on FT.com is subject to the FT Terms & ConditionsAll content on FT.com is for your general information and use only and is not intended to address your particular requirements. In particular, the content does not constitute any form of advice, recommendation, representation, endorsement or arrangement by FT and is not intended to be relied upon by users in making (or refraining from making) any specific investment or other decisions.Any information that you receive via FT.com is at best delayed intraday data and not "real time". Share price information may be rounded up/down and therefore not entirely accurate. FT is not responsible for any use of content by you outside its scope as stated in the FT Terms & Conditions.







					Welcome to the FT.com Markets Data
				

					We’re constantly improving and would like to hear from you.
				


Provide Feedback















 




    GFMH Key Statistics - Goliath Film & Media Holdings Financial Ratios - MarketWatch




































Bulletin






Investor Alert







New York Markets Close in:



Market Snapshot
Winners and Losers


















Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close






Expand
Keep Open
Close































Goliath Film & Media Holdings

                  OTC: GFMH
          



GO



Set Alerts
Find a Broker




Join TD Ameritrade




Market Index


 

Overview
      
Profile
      
News
      
Charts
      
Financials
      
Historical Quotes
      
Analyst Estimates
      
Options
      
SEC Filings
      
Insiders
      


/marketstate/country/us

Goliath Film & Media Holdings



Market open
 --Quotes are delayed by 20 min
Aug 1, 2017, 5:20 p.m.


GFMH

/quotes/zigman/13673575/delayed


$
0.0045




Change

0.00
0.00%

Volume
Volume 5,080
Quotes are delayed by 20 min








/quotes/zigman/13673575/delayed
Previous close

$
			0.0045
		


$
				0.0045
			
Change

0.00
0.00%





Day low
Day high
$0.0045
$0.0045










52 week low
52 week high

            $0.0019
        

            $0.0085
        

















			Company Description 


			Goliath Film & Media Holdings is a development stage company which plans to engage in developing and licensing distribution of video content of film and television content. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiary Goliath Film and Media International. The company was founded on February 16, 2...
		


                Goliath Film & Media Holdings is a development stage company which plans to engage in developing and licensing distribution of video content of film and television content. It operates through its wholly-owned subsidiary Goliath Film and Media International. The company was founded on February 16, 2010 and is headquartered in Marina del Rey, CA.
            




Valuation

P/E Current
29.35


P/E Ratio (with extraordinary items)
5.78


P/E Ratio (without extraordinary items)
17.50


Price to Sales Ratio
2.96


Price to Book Ratio
2.94


Enterprise Value to EBITDA
4.32


Enterprise Value to Sales
2.94


Total Debt to Enterprise Value
0.04

Efficiency

Revenue/Employee
58,333.00


Income Per Employee
11,487.00


Total Asset Turnover
0.98

Liquidity

Current Ratio
0.38


Quick Ratio
0.38


Cash Ratio
0.37



Profitability

Gross Margin
52.53


Operating Margin
20.45


Pretax Margin
20.45


Net Margin
19.69


Return on Assets
19.28


Return on Equity
45.97


Return on Total Capital
40.35


Return on Invested Capital
45.97

Capital Structure

Total Debt to Total Equity
11.08


Total Debt to Total Capital
9.98


Total Debt to Total Assets
5.86





      Officers and Executives
    



Name
Age
Officer Since
Title





Mr. Michael  Criscione 
64
2014
Director





Insider Actions


 – Purchase

 – Sale
1
 – Number of Transactions











{"OrganizationDocuments":[{"Documents":[{"document":[{"reportDateGroup":[{"reportDate":"2011-06-09","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"3","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-16","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-13","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-12","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-11","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-05-02","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-03-10","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"5","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-17","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"4","tradeType":"D"},{"numTransactions":"2","tradeType":"A"}]},{"reportDate":"2011-02-15","tradeTypeGroup":[{"numTransactions":"8","tradeType":"A"},{"numTransactions":"1","tradeType":"D"}]}]}]}]}]}



/news/latest/company/us/gfmh

      MarketWatch News on GFMH
    
No News currently available for GFMH





/news/nonmarketwatch/company/us/gfmh

      Other News on GFMH
    




 10-Q: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS
11:05 a.m. March 17, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS
3:40 p.m. Feb. 27, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-Q: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS
3:10 p.m. Feb. 16, 2017
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)




 10-K: GOLIATH FILM & MEDIA HOLDINGS
9:33 a.m. Dec. 1, 2016
 - Edgar Online -  (EDG = 10Q, 10K)














At a Glance

Goliath Film & Media Holdings
4640 Admiralty Way
Suite 500

Marina del Rey, California 90292




Phone
1 3107958302


Industry
Motion Picture/Sound Recording


Sector
Media/Entertainment


Fiscal Year-end
04/2017


View SEC Filings




Revenue
$175,000


Net Income
$34,460


Employees

        3.00


Annual Report for GFMH











/news/pressrelease/company/us/gfmh

      Press Releases on GFMH
    
No News currently available for GFMH







Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:43 AM EDT
August 3, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Closed


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
11:41aDow tags the 22,000 mark, also quietly clears the 20-day volatility bands
11:33aTreasury yields dip as traders look ahead to payrolls
11:29aSquare stock price target raised to $26 from $18 at Canaccord Genuity
11:29aOil prices rise as investors focus on U.S. data
11:29aGood news: Employees are starting to get serious about saving for retirement 
11:27aTrump’s long vacation is needed to stop leaks to the White House press
11:17aGM's Chevy Bolt beats Tesla's Model S in Consumer Reports' range test
11:12aTeva shares plummet 18% on cheaper generic drug prices, pulling rivals lower
11:11aDovish or hawkish? Bank of England leaves traders confused after ‘Super Thursday’
11:11aHere’s proof the average U.S. household isn’t the ‘dumb money’
11:10aDoes your kid really want a $200 stuffed giraffe?
11:08aTesla is a large public company, and Elon Musk must start acting like it
11:07aVoters golfing with President Trump? That was one Scaramucci idea before his exit
11:05aSnap's stock plunges further as rival Instagram Stories celebrates one-year anniversay
11:05aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $44 from $50 at Instinet
11:04aCheesecake Factory shares down 3.6% in Thursday trading
11:03aDocumentary Clip: 'Icarus'
11:03aCheesecake Factory price target cut to $50 from $60 at Canaccord Genuity
10:59aAmerisourceBergen stock plummets 9% alongside other companies affected by negative generic price trends
10:48aMeet this Trump addict whose ONE job is to offer bets on the Donald’s presidency
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
22,017.05

+0.81
+0.00%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,345.19

-17.45
-0.27%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,472.24

-5.33
-0.22%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15























































Goliath Film & Media Holdings 10-K Dec  1 2016 | Seeking AlphaSign in / Join NowGO»Goliath Film & Media Holdings (GFMH)FORM 10-K | Annual ReportDec  1 2016|About: Goliath Film & Media Holdings (GFMH)View as PDF

 Goliath Film & Media Holdings (Form: 10-K, Received: 12/01/2016 08:32:17) 










	 








	 






	 





	UNITED
	STATES






	SECURITIES
	AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION






	WASHINGTON,
	D.C. 20549






	 






	FORM
	10-K





	 






	[X]




	Annual
	Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934






	 




	 






	 




	For
	the fiscal year ended

	April 30, 2016







	 




	 






	[  ]




	Transition
	Report Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934






	 




	 






	 




	For
	the transition period from ____________ to ___________






	 




	 






	 




	Commission
	file number 0-18945






	 







	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS





	(Exact
	name of registrant as specified in its charter)




	 






	Nevada




	 




	84-1055077






	(State
	or other jurisdiction of




	 




	(I.R.S.
	Employer






	incorporation
	or organization)




	 




	Identification
	No.)







	 






	4640
	Admiralty Way, Suite 500, Marina del Rey, California





	 






	90292







	 (Address
	of principal executive offices)




	 




	(Zip
	Code)






	 




	Registrant’s
	telephone number, including area code: (909) 612-1708




	 




	Securities
	registered pursuant to Section 12(b) of the Act:

	None




	 



	Securities
	registered pursuant to Section 12(g) of the Act:

	Common Stock, par value $0.001





	 




	Indicate
	by check mark if the registrant is a well-known seasoned issuer, as defined in Rule 405 of the Securities Act. YES [  ] NO
	[X]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark if the registrant is not required to file reports pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Act. YES [  ] NO
	[X]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant (1) has filed all reports required to be filed by Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange
	Act of 1934 during the preceding 12 months (or for such shorter period that the registrant was required to file such reports)
	and (2) has been subject to such filing requirements for the past 90 days. YES [X] NO [  ]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant has submitted electronically and posted on its corporation Web site, if any, every Interactive
	Data File required to be submitted and posted pursuant to Rule 405 of Regulation S-T during the preceding 12 months (or such shorter
	period that the registrant was required to submit and post such files).[  ]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark if the disclosure of delinquent filers pursuant to Item 405 of Regulation S-K is not contained herein, and will
	not be contained, to the best of registrant’s knowledge, in definitive proxy or information statements incorporated by reference
	in Part III of this Form 10-K or any amendment to this Form 10-K. [  ]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the registrant is a large accelerated filer, an accelerated filer, or a non-accelerated filer or a small
	reporting company. See definition of “large accelerated filer”, “accelerated filer” and “small reporting
	company” in Rule 12b-2 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.




	 




	Large
	accelerated filer   [  ]   Accelerated filer   [  ]   Non-accelerated
	filer   [  ]   Smaller reporting company   [X]




	 




	Indicate
	by check mark whether the Registrant is a shell company (as defined in Rule 12b-2 of the Exchange Act). YES [  ] NO
	[X]




	 




	State
	issuer’s revenues for its most recent fiscal year: $175,000




	 




	The
	aggregate market value of the voting stock held by non-affiliates of the registrant as of October 31, 2015 was $86,567 based on
	28,855,555 shares being owned by non-affiliates, and the last sale price of $0.003 as of October 31, 2015.




	 




	Indicate
	the number of shares outstanding of each of the issuer’s classes of common stock, as of the latest practicable date.




	 




	There
	were

	158,213,917 shares

	of common stock

	, $0.001 par value,

	issued and outstanding as November 22, 2016




	 




	DOCUMENTS
	INCORPORATED BY REFERENCE – NONE




	 








	 






	 







	 


	 


	 









	 




	 







	 







	PART
	I





	 







	Item
	1. BUSINESS





	 





	Background.





	 




	The
	Company was incorporated in Nevada on February 16, 2010 under the name “China Advanced Technology” as the successor
	by merger to Vitalcare Diabetes Treatment Centers, Inc. (“Vitalcare”). In February and March 2010, Vitalcare underwent
	a holding company reorganization under Delaware law, pursuant to which it became a wholly-owned subsidiary of Vitalcare Holding
	Corporation, and Vitalcare, together with its assets and liabilities, was sold to a non-affiliated third party. Vitalcare Holding
	Corporation subsequently reincorporated in Nevada by merger into China Advanced.




	 




	Vitalcare
	was in the business of administering medical clinics specializing in diabetes treatment. It was the successor to Network Financial
	Services, Inc. (“Network”), which went public in an underwritten offering in 1987. Network was engaged in mortgage
	origination, and changed its name to Westmark Group Holdings (“Westmark”) in 1993 in connection with the acquisition
	of Westmark Mortgage from Primark Corporation. Westmark ceased operations at some time in 2006, and in 2006 ceased filing reports
	under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The corporate entity was thereafter known as Viking Consolidated, Inc. (2006), Tailor
	Aquaponics World Wide, Inc. (2007) and Diversified Acquisitions (2007) until it entered the medical clinic business in early 2008.
	The Company has no information regarding any business activities from 2006 after the mortgage origination business closed, to
	early 2008.




	 




	On
	October 25, 2011, Goliath Film and Media International, a California corporation, entered into an Agreement and Plan of Reorganization
	(the “Exchange Agreement”), pursuant to which Goliath Film and Media International was acquired by China Advanced
	Technology. Prior to the acquisition, our principal operations consisted of internet marketing, and were conducted through a wholly
	owned subsidiary, Live Wise, Inc. Live Wise was disposed of on October 31, 2011 for cancellation of debt and shares described
	below. At the Closing Date, there were no assets or liabilities on China Advanced Technology’s balance sheets.




	 




	The
	transaction closed on October 31, 2011 (the “Closing Date”). On the Closing Date China Advanced Technology acquired
	Goliath Film and Media International by issuing 47,000,000 shares of its Common Stock, constituting 70.1% of the outstanding shares
	after giving effect to their issuance and the cancellation of 15,619,816 shares held by China Advanced Technology’s prior
	control person. Immediately following the Closing, 67,100,000 shares were issued and outstanding. On the Closing Date, the name
	of China Advanced Technology was changed to Goliath Film and Media Holdings. All share numbers herein have been adjusted for an
	eight-for-1 forward stock split affected as of the Closing Date. The forward stock split was reflected in the trading market on
	February 13, 2012.




	 





	Overview.





	 




	Goliath
	Film and Media Holdings, through its wholly-owned subsidiaries Goliath Film and Media International and Goliath Movie Partners
	1, LLC (collectively, “Goliath” or the “Company”), develops, produces and licenses for distribution, domestically
	and internationally, quality digital content with an emphasis on “niche” markets of the feature motion picture and
	television content segments of the entertainment industry, such as, without limitation, education, faith-based, horror and socially
	responsible minority content. Goliath does not intend to engage in domestic theatrical distribution of motion pictures to any
	significant extent.




	 




	In
	qualified cases, Goliath will develop screenplays that will be outsourced to an independent entity for production, but will be
	licensed for distribution through the Company. Also, in certain cases Goliath will produce content that is tied to working with
	an established distributor that provides an advance or minimum guarantee for the production of a project that will be licensed
	by the participating distributor. Goliath plans to produce content and to distribute domestically and internationally, through
	a wide distribution network which includes major international theatrical exhibitors, and other distributors and television networks.
	We plan to utilize corporate sponsorships as a means of reducing the costs of advertising and marketing in distribution. Further,
	we may augment our marketing efforts with a limited and strategically focused advertising campaign in traditional “print”
	media with press releases targeted specifically toward standard entertainment industry trade journals and publications on an “as
	needed” basis as well as the inclusion of targeted “social media” campaigns.




	 




	Goliath’s
	revenue model includes receiving revenue from distribution fees. A limited number of its content properties include projects developed
	and produced by Goliath and those produced by an independent third party production entity.




	 







	 



	2



	 












	 




	Questions
	and Answers




	 





	What
	is your business?





	 




	We
	develop, produce and distribute motion pictures and digital content. At this time we do not intend to engage in theatrical releases
	of motion pictures, due to the high up- front costs of advertising and marketing theatrically. However, in some specific cases
	the company will consider theatrical releases based upon a “four wall, “ limited release delivery that will be focused
	on targeted niche audiences.




	 





	Distribution
	Rights






	 






	The
	Company has the following distribution rights:






	 





	On
	December 9, 2014 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Runaway Production for the distribution of two full length motion
	pictures, “Halloween Party” and “Wedding Video Nightmare”. No revenue has been recognized to date.




	This
	distribution agreement was cancelled on January 29, 2016.





	 





	On
	December 8, 2014 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with CJ Creative Productions for the distribution of three full length
	motion pictures, “Sharp Teeth”, “Vampire Dentist”, and “Marina Monster”. Goliath Film and
	Media Holding will receive 25% of gross proceeds. Goliath will have both North America and foreign distribution rights for a term
	of 36 months from December 8, 2014. No revenue has been recognized to date. This distribution agreement was cancelled on November,
	30, 2015.





	 





	On
	December 8, 2014 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Brightfilm Productions for the distribution of the full length motion
	picture, “I Wish You Love”. Goliath will receive 25% of gross proceeds. Goliath Film and Media Holdings will have
	both North America (excluding Canada) and foreign distribution rights for a term of 36 months from December 8, 2014. No revenue
	has been recognized to date. This distribution agreement was cancelled on October 15, 2015.





	 





	On
	March 9, 2015 Goliath signed a non-exclusive license to sell the feature length motion pictures: “Farewell”, “Buddies”
	and “The Pit.” The term is for one year expiring on March 9, 2016 with compensation to Goliath of 25% of gross proceeds
	from the sales of each of these films. No revenue has been recognized to date.





	 





	On
	October 22, 2014 Goliath entered into an agreement to distribute all foreign rights for the motion picture “Virus X,”
	“Film” starring Sybil Danning with some of the key terms as follows:




	 




	1.       Time
	frame (Term) – 18 months with ability to renew at same terms for another 18 months if agreed by both parties by end of the
	18 month term. Term begins October 22, 2014




	 




	2.       Markets
	– In all foreign media known and unknown




	 




	3.       Compensation
	to Goliath- 15% of gross proceeds on all foreign territories. Said 15% (of 100%) is inclusive and includes, but not limited to,
	all payments, fees and reimbursements of any and all kinds made and/or incurred by Goliath through the exploitation of the Film.
	No revenue has been recognized to date.




	 




	4.       Renewals
	- when the contract is renewed by a particular territory, Goliath will be the entity of record to effectuate the renewals, yet
	only after notification is made to and approved verbally or written by Empire Films.




	 




	On
	October 29, 2014, Goliath entered into a Distribution and Sales Agreement with EMILIO ROSO (“Producer”) granting all
	domestic and foreign distribution rights, excluding digital streaming for the motion pictures “Day of Redemption,”
	“On Borrowed Time” and “Tumbleweed,” with some of the major terms as follows:




	 




	1.       Time
	frame (Term) – 18 months. Term began October 29, 2014. This contract will not automatically renew.




	 




	2.       Markets
	– In all domestic and foreign media known and unknown and all domestic and foreign territories.




	 




	3.       Compensation
	to Goliath - 25% of gross proceeds on all domestic and foreign territories, except digital streaming. Said 25% (of 100%) is inclusive
	and includes, but not limited to, all payments, fees and reimbursements of any and all kinds made and/or incurred by Goliath through
	the exploitation of the motion pictures. No revenue has been recognized to date.




	 




	On
	February 13, 2012 the Company announced that it has acquired the distribution rights to the following motion pictures:

	Seducing
	Spirits, The Perfect Argument, Marina Murders, Film Struggle, Divorce in America, A Wonderful Summer, The Truth About Layla, Living
	with Cancer, and The Biggest Fan

	. Under the distribution agreements, Goliath will receive 30% of the gross revenues for each
	picture it distributes. In general, the Company’s distribution contracts cover both domestic and international licensing
	agreements; however, for the picture

	The Biggest Fan,

	the Company obtained limited distribution rights. No revenue has
	been recognized to date.




	 







	 



	3



	 














	 





	Production
	Agreements






	 





	On
	March 4, 2016 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion
	picture currently in post-production by Goliath. Per the agreement, Goliath will receive $125,000 in advance payments per an agreed
	delivery schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture “Bridal Bootcamp” a romantic comedy movie
	being produced by Goliath to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC will receive 35% of the gross
	proceeds for a period of 25 years on the motion picture. As of April 30, 2016, the Company has received $25,000 of the advance
	payments. Subsequent to year end the Company received an additional $75,000.





	 





	On
	September 18, 2015 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion
	picture currently completed by Goliath. Per the agreement, Goliath will receive $125,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery
	schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture “Merry Exes” a Christmas holiday movie being produced
	by Goliath to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC will receive 35% of the gross proceeds for
	a period of 25 years on the motion picture. As of April 30, 2016, the Company has received $75,000 of the advance payments. Subsequent
	to year end the Company received the remaining $50,000. Merry Exes was completed June 6, 2016 and Mar Vista is looking to distribute
	this film.




	 




	On
	May 20, 2015 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC to distribute a feature length motion picture
	currently completed by Goliath and being licensed by Mar vista Entertainment, LLC.. Per the agreement, the Company will receive
	$175,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery schedule for providing distribution rights on the motion picture “Terror
	Birds” a science fiction movie produced by Goliath to Mar Vista Entertainment LLC. Additionally, Mar Vista Entertainment,
	LLC will receive 30% of the gross proceeds for a period of 25 years on the film. As of April 30, 2016, the Company has received
	$175,000 of the advance payments. Terror Birds was completed December 14, 2015 and Mar Vista is looking to distribute this film.




	 




	On
	April 15, 2015 Goliath signed an agreement whereby the Company agreed to invest $15,000 to KKO Productions to produce a feature
	length motion picture known as “Forgiven”. Per the agreement Goliath will receive 15% of adjusted gross proceeds after
	its initial investment has been entirely recouped through adjusted gross proceed. Additionally, the Company will receive two on
	screen credits as Executive Producer as well as receiving credit on all advertising, publicity and packaging of the motion picture.
	The investment of $15,000 presented in other assets on the balance sheet has not yet been repaid, due to the fact that no revenues
	will be generated until this motion picture’s released.




	 





	What
	is the timeline for your activities during the next 12 months?





	 




	Over
	the next 90 days to one year, our efforts will be concentrated on developing and producing content with distributors for licensing
	by them of at least three projects.




	 





	What
	is this going to cost you?





	 




	We
	expect that producing the aforementioned content will cost approximately $150,000 per project, however licensing and distribution
	will be handled by an experienced distributor for a fee of anywhere from 30 – 35% and the costs of advertising and marketing
	will be handled by them and charged against gross distribution licensing proceeds.





	 






	Why
	are these motion pictures not being distributed already?






	 





	The
	motion pictures that are being produced by the Company and distributed by Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC take anywhere from six
	to nine months from completion of production and delivery to obtain licensing agreements.




	 




	Generically,
	the main reason why good, quality motion pictures are not distributed is that the production of a motion picture requires money
	and creativity, and marketing a motion picture requires an entirely different set of skills. Many people dream of making a movie;
	few aspire to distribute them. We estimate that there are in excess of 10,000 such motion pictures “gathering dust.”
	There also have been and continue to be substantial tax incentives for motion picture production in many States and international
	Territories, so that many producers do not need to depend on successful marketing in order to find investors for their projects.
	A secondary factor is the difficulty of finding a reputable distributor. We think that our management has an excellent reputation
	in the industry and we will be able to obtain distribution rights for content. Finally, many distributors as well as buyers do
	not have an interest in niche market films, because they see the market as limited. Goliath sees the problem to be, rather, there
	is no market merely because no one has assembled a critical mass of films for these niches. Most participants in the motion picture
	industry are based in “Hollywood” and the major coastal metropolitan areas. Our “faith-based” films especially
	are targeted toward the “Bible Belt” and the “Flyover Country”: places that the industry has consistently
	overlooked.




	 







	 



	4



	 












	 





	Why
	are you able to identify and acquire these motion pictures and educational videos?






	 





	After
	attending all the major content acquisition markets around the world over the last three years, our Staff has developed relationships
	with numerous quality filmmakers who need assistance in marketing and distributing their product. Goliath has also developed vital
	relationships with many of the major content distributors and networks. Many of the filmmakers have requested the Company’s
	assistance in marketing and distributing their product. Goliath will continue to pursue the marketing and distribution of product
	that is demanded in the marketplace and desired by major aggregators, distributors, networks and studios.




	 





	So
	how are you different than Amazon, Netflix, Blockbuster and Hulu, to name a few? How can you compete with them? They have a lot
	of money and name recognition. Why wouldn’t they jump into your niches?





	 




	As
	a content provider we are not competing with these entities but rather are working on providing them with quality content. As
	an example, NETFLIX has such a high demand for programming content, they are spending $5 billion this year for the acquisition
	of completed programming as well as for the development of original content by them. Therefore, as is mentioned, part of their
	resources are directed toward acquiring content and part is targeting in-house” and joint venture production of quality
	content. This content will be targeted to their subscription base on a domestic and international level.




	 




	There
	are a number of quality content producers that work with the major networks and content distributors, Goliath is moving toward
	becoming one of these content providers. We believe there exists significant opportunities for our company in that the demand
	for programming is increasing almost exponentially. Irrespective of the platform for viewing by the consumer/subscriber, the demand
	for quality content is continuing to expand. As an example there are currently, approximately 416 original scripted programs being
	aired in the entire television universe – a cancellation rate of 10% reflects a number that represents the entire programming
	universe in the late 1990’s and early 2000’s.. The upward trend is ongoing, which is where we see an opportunity for
	Goliath to provide product to reach many components of the overall market.




	 





	Don’t
	cable and satellite networks already offer specialty channels like TBN (for faith based) and BET (Black Entertainment Television
	(for the African-American Community)?





	 




	As
	mentioned above about NETFLIX, even though these channels maybe in niche markets they must expand the type, genre and format of
	the content that they are showing in order to remain viable, therefore the opportunity to assist them by providing quality programming
	is ongoing and expanding..




	 





	What
	other niches are you looking at entering?





	 




	We
	believe that there is an increasing and ongoing trend in home entertainment in servicing niches. Many viewers have cable or satellite
	service with hundreds of channels, but view only a few channels that cater to their particular interests. One significant type
	of niche we are targeting are the numerous immigrant groups in the United States. Other than Spanish speaking immigrants, coverage
	is scarce. The last official data (2004) from the US Census Bureau is that 34.2 million persons in the US are foreign born, with
	54% from Latin America, 25% from Asia and 14% from Europe. Foreign-born immigrants like to watch movies from their home countries.




	 




	There
	are many interest groups that might be interested in specialty movies or programming. As an example in Hawaii and Southern California,
	for instance, Surfing is quite popular, and there exists a huge body of surfing films which would be of interest.




	 





	What
	about ancillary markets?





	 




	We
	plan to incorporate advertising and marketing through social media and traditional outlets to the highest degree possible.




	 





	What
	films do you have now in inventory?





	 




	We
	presently have acquired the distribution rights to the following motion pictures:

	, Seducing Spirits, The Perfect Argument,
	Marina Murders, Film Struggle, Divorce in America, A Wonderful Summer, The Truth About Layla, Living with Cancer, The Biggest
	Fan, Days of Redemption, On Borrowed Time, Tumbleweed, Virus X, Farewell, Buddies, and The Pit

	. Under the distribution agreements
	Goliath will receive 30% of the gross revenues for each of the pictures we distribute. In general, our distribution contracts
	cover both domestic and international licensing agreements; however, for the picture

	The Biggest Fan

	we obtained limited
	distribution rights.





	 








	 



	5



	 













	 






	How
	do these distribution rights work?





	 




	We
	enter into a Distribution Agreement for each motion picture. Terms may be perpetual or limited by years. The motion pictures that
	we are acquiring with the proceeds of this offering will have a term of five years. We will generally obtain a fee of 20% to 30%
	of gross revenues. Licensing will be flexible for usage applications on a yearly or multi-year basis. Most markets, especially
	foreign territories have a tendency to continuously renew content licensing.




	 





	How
	many employees do you have? Do you have an office?





	 




	We
	have just 3 employees and we believe that is sufficient during the development, production and “content aggregation”
	phase of our development. Our administrative office is in Marina del Rey, California.




	 





	Do
	you have a website?





	 




	Our
	website is www.goliathfilmandmediainternational.com. We have a mirror site at www.goliathfilmandmedia.com.





	 






	Background






	 







	Item
	1A. RISK FACTORS.





	 





	Risks
	Related to Our Business





	 






	Our
	limited operating history makes it difficult to evaluate our future business prospects and to make decisions based on of our historical
	performance.






	 




	We
	have a limited operating history, which makes it difficult to evaluate our business on the basis of historical operations. As
	a consequence, it is difficult to forecast our future results based upon our historical data. Reliance on our historical results
	may not be representative of the results we will achieve. Because of the uncertainties related to our lack of historical operations,
	we may be hindered in our ability to anticipate and timely adapt to increases or decreases in sales, product costs or expenses.
	If we make poor budgetary decisions as a result of unreliable historical data, we could be less profitable or incur losses, which
	may result in a decline in our stock price.






	 








	Economic
	conditions and uncertain economic outlook could adversely affect our results of operations and financial condition






	 




	The
	global economy is currently undergoing a period of unprecedented volatility. We cannot predict when economic conditions will improve
	or stabilize. A prolonged period of economic volatility or decline could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations
	and financial condition and/or exacerbate the other risks related to its business.




	 






	Our
	results of operations depend significantly upon the commercial success of the motion pictures and television programming that
	we distribute, and underperformance at the box office or in television licensing of one or more motion pictures in any period
	can cause our results to be less than anticipated






	 




	Our
	results of operations will depend significantly upon the commercial success of the motion pictures and television programming
	that we distribute, which cannot be predicted with certainty. In particular, the underperformance at the box office of one or
	more motion pictures in any period may cause our revenue and earnings results for that period (and potentially, subsequent periods)
	to be less than anticipated, in some instances to a significant extent. Due to the difficulty of predicting our results of operations
	and the other factors, it is difficult for industry or financial analysts to accurately forecast our results. The trading market
	for our common shares is influenced by the research and reports that such industry or financial analysts publish about us or our
	business. If an analyst who covers us changes his or her financial estimates or investment recommendation, or if our results of
	operations fall short of their estimates, the price of our common shares could decline.




	 






	Our
	results of operations are difficult to predict and depend on a variety of factors






	 




	Our
	results of operations will depend significantly upon the commercial success of the motion pictures or television content that
	we distribute, which cannot be predicted with certainty. Accordingly, our results of operations may fluctuate significantly from
	period to period, and the results of any one period may not be indicative of the results for any future periods. Our results of
	operations also may fluctuate due to the timing, mix, number and availability of our theatrical motion picture and home entertainment
	releases, as well as license periods for our content. Our operating results may increase or decrease during a particular period
	or fiscal year due to differences in the number and/or mix of films released compared to the corresponding period in the prior
	year or prior fiscal year. Our operating results also fluctuate due to our accounting practices (which are standard for the industry)
	which may cause us to recognize the production and marketing expenses in different periods than the recognition of related revenues,
	which may occur in later periods. For example, in accordance with GAAP and industry practice, we are required to expense film
	advertising costs as incurred, but are also required to recognize the revenue from any motion picture or television program over
	the entire revenue stream expected to be generated by the individual picture or television program.




	 







	 



	6



	 












	 




	The
	comparability of our results may be affected by changes in accounting guidance or changes in our ownership of certain assets and
	businesses. Accordingly, our results of operations from year to year may not be directly comparable to prior reporting periods.




	 




	As
	a result of the foregoing and other factors, our results of operations may fluctuate significantly from period to period, and
	the results of any one period may not be indicative of the results for any future period.






	 








	Our
	success depends on the ability of our senior management team, as well as our ability to attract and retain key personnel.






	 




	Our
	success is highly dependent on the abilities of its management team. The management team must be able to effectively work together
	to successfully conduct our current operations, as well as implement our strategy, which includes significant domestic expansion.
	If we are unable to do so, our results of operations and financial condition may suffer. In addition, as part of our strategy
	of international expansion, there is intense competition for the services of qualified personnel. The failure to retain current
	key managers or key members of the development, production, or marketing staff, or to hire additional qualified personnel for
	new operations could be detrimental to our business.




	 





	Risks
	Related to Our Securities





	 






	We
	may raise capital in future offerings



	.





	 




	An
	offering might require the participation of institutional investors, which are more likely to demand more stringent terms for
	any placement. We have not determined the terms for any offering. Any future offering may be for common stock, or may be for a
	security with rights superior to that of the common stock. In connection with any offering, we may be required to add investor’s
	representatives to the Board of Directors, or may be required to commit to other conditions. If other conditions are not met,
	existing investors could have their rights or equity ownership substantially diluted. We cannot at this time determine the terms
	of any follow-on offering or whether it will ever occur.





	 







	We
	do not expect to pay dividends on our outstanding shares in the foreseeable future.






	 




	We
	have not paid dividends in the past and do not have, or anticipate having, any funds for such purpose in the foreseeable future.
	Even if such funds become available, we do not expect to pay dividends in the foreseeable future but, instead, will use all funds
	from operations for the continued development of the business.




	 






	Our
	common stock is quoted only on the OTC Bulletin Board, which may have an unfavorable impact on our stock price and liquidity.






	 




	Our
	common stock is quoted on the OTC Bulletin Board. The OTC Bulletin Board is a significantly more limited market than the New York
	Stock Exchange or NASDAQ system. The quotation of our shares on the OTC Bulletin Board may result in a less liquid market available
	for existing and potential stockholders to trade shares of our common stock, could depress the trading price of our common stock,
	and could have a long-term adverse impact on our ability to raise capital in the future.




	 






	Because
	we became public by means of a “reverse merger,” we may not be able to attract the attention of major brokerage firms.






	 




	Additional
	risks may exist since we became public through a “reverse merger.” Securities analysts of major brokerage firms may
	not provide coverage of us since there is little incentive to brokerage firms to recommend the purchase of our common stock. We
	cannot assure you that brokerage firms will want to conduct any secondary offerings on behalf of us in the future.




	 






	We
	cannot assure you that the common stock will become liquid or that it will be listed on a securities exchange.






	 




	We
	would like to list our common stock on the NASDAQ Capital Market as soon as practicable. However, we cannot assure you that we
	will be able to meet the initial listing standards of either of those or of any other stock exchange, or that we will be able
	to maintain any such listing. We are presently on the OTC Bulletin Board thus, investor liquidity may be limited.




	 







	 



	7



	 












	 






	In
	the event we seek additional capital through equity or debt offerings, our existing stockholders may be diluted or we may be unable
	to find additional capital on terms favorable to us and our stockholders.






	 




	In
	the event that we need additional working capital for our projected operations, we may seek capital through debt or equity offerings
	which could result in the issuance of additional shares of our capital stock and/or rights to acquire additional shares of our
	capital stock. Those additional issuances of capital stock would result in a reduction of the percentage of ownership interest
	held by our existing stockholders. Also, the addition of a substantial number of shares of our common stock into the market or
	the registration of any other securities may significantly and negatively affect the prevailing market price for our common stock.
	Finally, we may not be able to find additional capital on terms favorable to us through existing markets or investors due to market
	conditions, our historical performance, or our stock price.




	 






	There
	may be issuances of shares of preferred stock in the future.






	 




	Although
	we currently do not have preferred shares outstanding, we could at some time in the future authorize preferred shares and the
	board of directors could complete the issuance of a series of preferred stock that would grant holders preferred rights to our
	assets upon liquidation, the right to receive dividends before dividends would be declared to common stockholders, and the right
	to the redemption of such shares, possibly together with a premium, prior to the redemption of the common stock. To the extent
	that we do issue preferred stock, the rights of holders of common stock could be impaired thereby, including without limitation,
	with respect to liquidation.




	 






	Compliance
	with corporate governance and disclosure standards is costly.






	 




	We
	have spent and continue to spend a significant amount of management time and resources to comply with laws, regulations and standards
	relating to corporate governance and public disclosure. Because we qualify as a smaller reporting company, our independent registered
	public accounting firm is not required to provide an attestation report. However, there is no guarantee that we will receive management
	assurance or an attestation by our independent registered public accounting firm that internal control over financial reporting
	is effective in future periods. In the event that our chief executive officer, chief financial officer or independent registered
	public accounting firm determines that our internal controls over financial reporting is not effective as required by Section
	404 of Sarbanes-Oxley, investor perceptions of us may be adversely affected. In addition, overhead may increase as a result of
	the additional costs associated with complying with the complex legal requirements associated with being a public reporting company.




	 






	Our
	compliance with SEC rules concerning internal controls may be time consuming, difficult and costly.






	 




	It
	may be time consuming, difficult and costly for us to develop and implement the internal controls and reporting procedures required
	by SEC rules including Sarbanes-Oxley. We may need to hire additional financial reporting, internal controls and other finance
	staff in order to develop and implement appropriate internal controls and reporting procedures. If we are unable to comply with
	Sarbanes-Oxley’s internal controls requirements, we may not be able to obtain the independent accountant certifications
	that Sarbanes-Oxley Act requires publicly-traded companies to obtain.





	 







	Item
	1B. UNRESOLVED STAFF COMMENTS





	 




	This
	item is not applicable because we are a “smaller reporting company” as defined in Exchange Act Rule 12b-2.





	 







	Item
	2. PROPERTIES





	 




	Our
	principal executive and administrative offices are currently located at 4640 Admiralty Way, Suite 500, Marina del Rey, CA 90292.
	We rent these offices on a month to month basis and they are adequate for our current needs.





	 







	Item
	3. LEGAL PROCEEDINGS





	 




	We
	are not a party to or otherwise involved in any legal proceedings.




	 




	In
	the ordinary course of business, from time to time we may be involved in various pending or threatened legal actions. The litigation
	process is inherently uncertain and it is possible that the resolution of such matters might have a material adverse effect upon
	our financial condition and/or results of operations. However, in the opinion of our management, other than as set forth herein,
	matters currently pending or threatened against us are not expected to have a material adverse effect on our financial position
	or results of operations.




	 







	 



	8



	 













	 







	Item
	4. MINE SAFETY DISCLOSURES






	 






	Not
	Applicable.








	 








	PART
	II





	 









	Item
	5.






	MARKET
	FOR REGISTRANT’S COMMON EQUITY, RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS AND ISSUER PURCHASES OF EQUITY SECURITIES







	 




	 






	(a)




	Market
	information and issuance of unregistered securities






	 




	The
	high and low sales prices for the common stock through April 30, 2016 were as follows:




	 








	Quarter
	Ended




	 




	High




	 




	Low






	April
	30, 2016




	 




	 




	$




	0.003




	 




	 




	$




	0.002




	 






	January 31, 2015




	 




	 




	 




	0.004




	 




	 




	 




	0.002




	 






	October 31, 2015




	 




	 




	 




	0.005




	 




	 




	 




	0.002




	 






	July 31, 2015




	 




	 




	 




	0.005




	 




	 




	 




	0.002




	 






	 






	Quarter
	Ended




	 




	High




	 




	Low






	April
	30, 2015




	 




	 




	$




	0.006




	 




	 




	$




	0.003




	 






	January 31, 2014




	 




	 




	 




	0.005




	 




	 




	 




	0.002




	 






	October 31, 2014




	 




	 




	 




	0.004




	 




	 




	 




	0.001




	 






	July 31, 2014




	 




	 




	 




	0.006




	 




	 




	 




	0.002




	 







	 




	All
	share information is adjusted for stock splits and stock dividends. The above information was supplied by the OTC Exchange and
	these prices reflect inter-dealer prices, without retail mark-up, mark-down or commission and may not represent actual transactions.




	 






	(b)




	Holders






	 




	As
	of November 22, 2016, there were 89 record holders of our common stock.




	 






	(c)




	Dividends






	 




	We
	have not paid any dividends on its common stock. We currently intend to retain any earnings for use in our business, and therefore
	does not anticipate paying cash dividends in the foreseeable future.




	 






	(d)




	Equity
	Compensation Plans






	 




	There
	are no Equity Compensation Plans in place as of April 30, 2016




	 





	Company
	issuances of common stock during the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015.





	 




	None




	 




	(e)                  Performance
	Graphic. We are not required to provide a performance graph since it is a “smaller reporting company” as defined in
	Regulation S-K Rule 10(f).




	 




	In
	fiscal year 2016, we issued a total of 13,249,000 restricted common shares to an affiliate in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange
	for approximately $132,490. The issuance was exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933,
	and the investor was sophisticated and familiar with our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 




	In
	fiscal year 2016, we issued a total of 6,000,000 restricted common shares to a third party investor in accordance with Rule 144,
	in exchange for approximately $60,000. The issuance was exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act
	of 1933, and the investor was sophisticated and familiar with our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 







	 



	9



	 













	 









	Item
	6.






	SELECTED
	FINANCIAL DATA







	 




	As
	a smaller reporting company we are not required to respond to this item.





	 









	Item
	7.






	MANAGEMENT’S
	DISCUSSION AND ANALYSIS OR PLAN OF OPERATIONS







	 





	Disclaimer
	Regarding Forward-Looking Statements





	 




	This
	Annual Report on Form 10-K contains forward-looking statements within the meaning of the federal securities laws. These include
	statements about our expectations, beliefs, intentions or strategies for the future, which we indicate by words or phrases such
	as “anticipate,” “expect,” “intend,” “plan,” “will,” “we believe,”
	“believes,” “management believes” and similar language. Except for the historical information contained
	herein, the matters discussed in this “Management’s Discussion and Analysis of Financial Condition and Results of
	Operations,” and elsewhere in this report are forward-looking statements that involve risks and uncertainties. The factors
	listed in the section captioned “Risk Factors,” as well as any cautionary language in this report; provide examples
	of risks, uncertainties and events that may cause our actual results to differ materially from those projected. Except as may
	be required by law, we undertake no obligation to update any forward-looking statement to reflect events after the date of this
	Form 10-K.





	 






	Critical
	Accounting Policies and Estimates






	 





	The
	SEC has defined a company’s critical accounting policies as the ones that are most important to the portrayal of the Company’s
	financial condition and results of operations and which require the Company to make its most difficult and subjective judgments,
	often as a result of the need to make estimates of matters that are inherently uncertain. Based on this definition, we have identified
	the critical accounting policies and judgments addressed below. We also have other key accounting policies that are significant
	to understanding our results. For additional information, see Note 1 - Summary of Significant Accounting Policies.




	 




	The
	following are deemed to be the most significant accounting policies affecting the Company.




	 





	Principles
	of Consolidation







	 






	The
	consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All significant inter-company balances
	and transactions are eliminated on consolidation.




	 





	Basis
	of Presentation





	 




	The
	preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
	requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of
	the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reported period. Actual results could differ
	from those estimates. Management further acknowledges that it is solely responsible for adopting sound accounting practices, establishing
	and maintaining a system of internal accounting control and preventing and detecting fraud. The Company’s system of internal
	accounting control is designed to assure, among other items, that (1) recorded transactions are valid; (2) all valid transactions
	are recorded and (3) transactions are recorded in the period in a timely manner to produce financial statements which present
	fairly the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the company for the respective periods being presented.




	 





	Use
	of Estimates







	 






	The
	preparation of financial statements in accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management
	to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets
	and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting
	period. A change in managements’ estimates or assumptions could have a material impact on the Company’s financial
	condition and results of operations during the period in which such changes occurred. The more significant estimates and assumptions
	by management include among others: Estimated revenue of films. The current economic environment has increased the degree of uncertainty
	inherent in these estimates and assumptions.




	 







	 



	10



	 












	 




	Actual
	results could differ from those estimates. The Company’s financial statements reflect all adjustments that management believes
	are necessary for the fair presentation of their financial condition and results of operations for the periods presented.




	 





	Revenue
	Recognition





	 




	We
	will recognize revenues in accordance with ASC 926-605, “Entertainment Films, Revenue Recognition”.




	 




	Under
	ASC 926-605, five conditions must be met before revenue can be recognized: (i) there is persuasive evidence that an arrangement
	exists, (ii) the film is complete and has been delivered, (iii) the license period has begun, (vi) the price is fixed or determinable,
	and (v) collection is reasonably assured. The Company provides for an allowance for doubtful account based history and experience
	considering economic and industry trends. The Company does not have any off-Balance Sheet exposure related to its customers.




	 




	The
	Company recognizes revenue when the distributor confirms to the Company that the film has been delivered to the distributor with
	all technical and document deliveries received, waived or deferred and the film has been entered into the distributor’s
	rights system.




	 





	Accounts
	Receivable





	 




	Accounts
	receivable, if any are carried at the expected net realizable value. The allowance for doubtful accounts, when determined, will
	be based on management’s assessment of the collectability of specific customer accounts and the aging of the accounts receivables.
	If there were a deterioration of a major customer’s creditworthiness, or actual defaults were higher than historical experience,
	our estimates of the recoverability of the amounts due to us could be overstated, which could have a negative impact on operations.




	 




	The
	Company currently does not have any accounts receivable. The above accounting policies will be adopted upon the Company carrying
	accounts receivable.




	 





	Intangible
	Assets





	 




	The
	Company’s intangible assets consist of intellectual property, principally motion pictures. The Company periodically reviews
	its long lived assets to ensure that their carrying value does not exceed their fair market value. There was no amortization expense
	or impairment for the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015.




	 





	Income
	Taxes





	 




	We
	account for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) Accounting Standards Codification
	(“ASC”) No. 740, Income Taxes (“ASC 740”). Under ASC 740, deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized
	for the future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets
	and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected
	to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under ASC
	740, the effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes
	the enactment date.




	 





	Stock
	Compensation





	 




	In
	accordance with ASC No. 718,

	Compensation – Stock Compensation

	(“ASC 718”), we measure the compensation
	costs of share-based compensation arrangements based on the grant-date fair value and recognize the costs in the financial statements
	over the period during which employees are required to provide services. Share-based compensation arrangements include stock options,
	restricted share plans, performance-based awards, share appreciation rights and employee share purchase plans. As such, compensation
	cost is measured on the date of grant at their fair value. Such compensation amounts, if any, are amortized over the respective
	vesting periods of the option grant. We apply this statement prospectively. Equity instruments (“instruments”) issued
	to other than employees are recorded on the basis of the fair value of the instruments, as required by ASC 718. ASC No. 505,

	Equity
	Based Payments to Non-Employees

	(“ASC 505”) defines the measurement date and recognition period for such instruments.
	In general, the measurement date is (a) when a performance commitment, as defined, is reached or (b) when the earlier of (i) the
	non-employee performance is complete or (ii) the instruments are vested. The measured value related to the instruments is recognized
	over a period based on the facts and circumstances of each particular grant as defined in the ASC 505.




	 







	 



	11



	 












	 





	Accounting
	for Derivative Financial Instruments





	 




	We
	evaluate financial instruments using the guidance provided by ASC 815 and apply the provisions thereof to the accounting of items
	identified as derivative financial instruments not indexed to our stock.




	 





	Fair
	Value of Financial Instruments





	 




	We
	follow the provisions of ASC 820. This Topic defines fair value, establishes a measurement framework and expands disclosures about
	fair value measurements.




	 




	We
	use fair value measurements for determining the valuation of derivative financial instruments payable in shares of its common
	stock. This primarily involves option pricing models that incorporate certain assumptions and projections to determine fair value.
	These require management’s judgment.




	 





	Fair
	Value Measurements






	 





	Effective
	beginning second quarter 2010, the FASB ASC Topic 825,

	Financial Instruments

	, requires disclosures about fair value of
	financial instruments in quarterly reports as well as in annual reports. For the Company, this statement applies to certain investments
	and long-term debt. Also, the FASB ASC Topic 820,

	Fair Value Measurements and Disclosures

	, clarifies the definition of
	fair value for financial reporting, establishes a framework for measuring fair value and requires additional disclosures about
	the use of fair value measurements.




	 




	Various
	inputs are considered when determining the value of the Company’s investments and long-term debt. The inputs or methodologies
	used for valuing securities are not necessarily an indication of the risk associated with investing in these securities. These
	inputs are summarized in the three broad levels listed below.




	 






	●




	Level
	1 – observable market inputs that are unadjusted quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in active markets.






	 




	 






	●




	Level
	2 – other significant observable inputs (including quoted prices for similar securities, interest rates, credit risk,
	etc.).






	 




	 






	●




	Level
	3 – significant unobservable inputs (including the Company’s own assumptions in determining the fair value of
	investments).






	 




	The
	carrying value of financial assets and liabilities recorded at fair value is measured on a recurring or nonrecurring basis. Financial
	assets and liabilities measured on a non-recurring basis are those that are adjusted to fair value when a significant event occurs.
	The Company had no financial assets or liabilities carried and measured on a nonrecurring basis during the reporting periods.
	Financial assets and liabilities measured on a recurring basis are those that are adjusted to fair value each time a financial
	statement is prepared. The Company had no financial assets and/or liabilities carried at fair value on a recurring basis at April
	30, 2016, assets and liabilities approximate fair value due to their short term nature.




	 




	The
	availability of inputs observable in the market varies from instrument to instrument and depends on a variety of factors including
	the type of instrument, whether the instrument is actively traded, and other characteristics particular to the transaction. For
	many financial instruments, pricing inputs are readily observable in the market, the valuation methodology used is widely accepted
	by market participants, and the valuation does not require significant management discretion. For other financial instruments,
	pricing inputs are less observable in the market and may require management judgment. As of April 30, 2016, the Company had no
	assets other than prepaid expenses and capitalized film production costs.




	 





	Basic
	and diluted earnings per share





	 




	Basic
	earnings per share are based on the weighted-average number of shares of common stock outstanding. Diluted Earnings per share
	is based on the weighted-average number of shares of common stock outstanding adjusted for the effects of common stock that may
	be issued as a result of the following types of potentially dilutive instruments:




	 






	●




	Warrants,






	 




	 






	●




	Employee
	stock options, and






	 




	 






	●




	Other
	equity awards, which include long-term incentive awards.






	 







	 



	12



	 












	 




	The
	FASB ASC Topic 260,

	Earnings Per Share

	, requires the Company to include additional shares in the computation of earnings
	per share, assuming dilution.




	 




	Diluted
	earnings per share is based on the assumption that all dilutive options were converted or exercised. Dilution is computed by applying
	the treasury stock method. Under this method, options are assumed to be exercised at the time of issuance, and as if funds obtained
	thereby were used to purchase common stock at the average market price during the period.




	 




	Basic
	and diluted earnings per share are the same as there were no potentially dilutive instruments for the years ended April 30, 2016
	and 2015.




	 





	Concentrations,
	Risks, and Uncertainties





	 




	The
	Company did not have a concentration of business with suppliers or customers constituting greater than 10% of the Company’s
	gross sales during 2016 and 2015.




	 





	Recent
	Accounting Pronouncements






	 





	We
	have evaluated new accounting pronouncements that have been issued and are not yet effective for us and determined that there
	are no such pronouncements expected to have an impact on our future financial statements.




	 





	Plan
	of Operations






	 





	Although
	the Company had net income of $34,460 for the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company had a net loss of $278,815 for the year ended
	April 30, 2015. These factors create substantial doubt about the Company’s ability to continue as a going concern. The Company’s
	management plan to continue as a going concern revolves around its ability to execute its business strategy of distributing digital
	content, as well as raising the necessary capital to pay ongoing general and administrative expenses of the Company.




	 




	In
	the fiscal years ending April 30, 2016 and 2015, $192,490 and $136,365, respectively, was raised from the sale of stock for future
	business projects with us.




	 







	Results
	of Operations






	 






	Fiscal
	Year Ended April 30, 2016 Compared to Fiscal Year Ended April 30, 2015





	 






	Revenue






	 




	For
	the fiscal year ended April 30, 2016, we completed and delivered Terror Birds and recognized $175,000 as revenue from advance
	payments previously received from Mar Vista Entertainment. For the fiscal year ended April 30, 2015, we had no revenues.




	 






	Cost
	of Sales






	 




	For
	the fiscal year ended April 30, 2016, we completed and delivered Terror Birds and recognized $83,075 of production costs as cost
	of sales. For the fiscal year ended April 30, 2015, we had no cost of sales.




	 






	Operating
	expenses






	 




	Operating
	expenses decreased by $217,034, or 79.4%, to $56,145 in the year ended April 30, 2016 from $273,179 in the year ended April 30,
	2015 primarily due to decreases in professional fees, consulting services, travel costs, stock based compensation expense, marketing
	costs, and equipment rental costs, offset primarily by increases in rent.




	 




	Operating
	expenses for the year ended April 30, 2016 were comprised primarily of $1,174 in professional fees; $40,150 in consulting services
	costs, travel costs of $7,569; rent of $2,190, and $5,062 of other operating expenses.




	 




	Operating
	expenses for the year ended April 30, 2015 were comprised primarily of $77,489 in consulting services costs; travel costs of $14,619,
	equipment rental costs of $2,775, stock based compensation expense of $136,000, marketing costs of $28,245, office rent of $1,642,
	professional fees of $10,192, and $2,217 of other operating expenses.




	 







	 



	13



	 












	 






	Net
	income (loss) before income taxes






	 




	Net
	income (loss) before income taxes for the year ended April 30, 2016 totaled $35,780 primarily due to revenue of $175,000 and decreases
	in professional fees, consulting services costs, office rent, and travel costs, compared to a loss of $277,975 for the year ended
	April 30, 2015 primarily due to consulting services costs, travel costs, marketing costs, stock based compensation expenses, office
	rent, and professional fees.





	 







	Assets
	and Liabilities






	 




	Total
	assets were $356,516 as of April 30, 2016 compared to $878 as of April 30, 2015, or an increase of $355,638, primarily the result
	of increases in film production costs of $315,907, other assets of $15,000, and cash of $25,310. Total liabilities as of April
	30, 2016 were $168,073 compared to $39,385 as of April 30, 2015, or an increase of $128,688. The increase was primarily the result
	of increases in advance for film production costs of $100,000, line of credit of $20,887, and accounts payable of $16,801, offset
	by a decrease in related party payables of $9,000.




	 






	Stockholders’
	Equity (Deficit)






	 




	Stockholders’
	equity (deficit) was $188,443 as of April 30, 2016. Stockholder’s equity (deficit) during the fiscal year ended April 30,
	2016 consisted primarily of shares issued for cash in the amount of $192,490, and net profit of $34,460, offset partially by previous
	deficit of $(38,507).





	 







	Liquidity
	and Capital Resources





	 






	General


	– Overall, we had an increase in cash flows of $24,731 in the year ending April 30, 2016 resulting from cash provided
	by financing activities of $213,377, offset partially by cash used in operating activities of $173,646, and cash used in investing
	activities of $15,000.




	 




	The
	following is a summary of our cash flows provided by (used in) operating, investing, and financing activities during the periods
	indicated:




	 








	 




	 




	Year
	Ended April 30,






	 




	 




	2016




	 




	2015






	 




	 




	 




	 




	 






	Cash at beginning of period




	 




	$




	579




	 




	 




	$




	-




	 






	Net cash used in operating activities




	 




	 




	(173,646




	)




	 




	 




	(133,892




	)






	Net cash used in investing activities




	 




	 




	(15,000




	)




	 




	 




	-




	 






	Net cash provided
	by financing activities




	 




	 




	213,337




	 




	 




	 




	134,471




	 






	Cash at end of period




	 




	$




	25,310




	 




	 




	$




	579




	 







	 




	Net
	cash used in operating activities was $173,646 for the year ending April 30, 2016 compared to net cash used in operations for
	the year ending April 30, 2015 of $133,892 primarily due to the change in operating assets and liabilities of $208,106, primarily
	due to the change in film production costs of $315,907, payables of $7,801, and advances for film production of $100,000, and
	offset partially by net profit of $34,460 for the year ending April 30, 2016.




	 




	Net
	cash used in investing activities was $15,000 for the year ending April 30, 2016, compared to net cash used in investing activities
	of $0 for the year ending April 30, 2015 primarily as the result of the investment in the production of motion pictures.




	 




	Net
	cash provided by financing activities was $213,337 for the year ending April 30, 2016, compared to net cash provided by financing
	activities of $134,471 for the year ending April 30, 2015 primarily as the result of the issuance of stock for cash of $192,490,
	and a line of credit from bank of $20,887.




	 




	Our
	cash needs in the year ending April 30, 2016 are estimated to be $200,000. This budget is based on the assumption that we will
	carry out one project at a time for which we will need about $50,000 in working capital; general and administrative expenses of
	$150,000 for the costs related to being public, and miscellaneous office expenses. We sold 30,852,250 shares for net proceeds
	of $328,855 in offerings conducted in fiscal years 2016 and 2015. As we move forward with our business plan we will need to raise
	additional capital either through the sale of stock or funding from shares and or officers and directors to cover our cash needs
	through the end of the 2017 fiscal year.




	 




	Information
	included in this report includes forward looking statements, which can be identified by the use of forward-looking terminology
	such as may, expect, anticipate, believe, estimate, or continue, or the negative thereof or other variations thereon or comparable
	terminology. The statements in “Risk Factors” and other statements and disclaimers in this report constitute cautionary
	statements identifying important factors, including risks and uncertainties, relating to the forward-looking statements that could
	cause actual results to differ materially from those reflected in the forward-looking statements.




	 







	 



	14



	 












	 





	Equity
	Financing






	 





	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, we entered into private placement memorandums with an affiliate under which we issued 13,249,000
	shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $132,490. The issuance was exempt from registration
	pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investors were sophisticated and familiar with our operations
	at the time of the issuance of the shares.





	 





	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, we entered into a private placement memorandum with a third party investor under which we issued
	6,000,000 shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $60,000. The issuance was exempt
	from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investors were sophisticated and familiar with
	our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.





	 





	During
	the year ended April 30, 2015, we entered into private placement memorandums with an affiliate under which we issued 11,603,250
	shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $136,365. The issuance was exempt from registration
	pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investors were sophisticated and familiar with our operations
	at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 




	We
	issued 5,000,000 restricted common shares to John Ballard on May 1, 2014, our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to his consulting
	contract dated May 1, 2014. We also issued 2,000,000 restricted common shares for professional services per consulting contracts
	dated May 1, 2014.




	 





	Off-Balance
	Sheet Arrangements





	 




	We
	do not have any off-balance sheet arrangements that have or are reasonably likely to have a current or future effect on its financial
	condition, revenues or expenses, results of operations, liquidity, capital expenditures or capital resources that are material
	to investors.




	 





	Inflation





	 




	Management
	believes that inflation has not had a material effect on the Company’s results of operations.






	 









	Item
	7A.






	QUANTITATIVE
	AND QUALITATIVE DISCLOSURES ABOUT MARKET RISK.








	 





	This
	item is not applicable since we are a smaller reporting company

	.





	 









	 



	15



	 














	 










	Item
	8.






	FINANCIAL
	STATEMENTS AND SUPPLEMENTARY DATA







	 




	Our
	financial statements include the following:




	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS





	 





	INDEX
	TO CONSOLIDATED FINANCIAL STATEMENTS




	YEARS
	ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015




	 






	 




	PAGE






	 




	 







	Report of Independent Registered Public Accounting Firm





	17





	 


	 






	Consolidated Balance Sheets





	18





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Operations





	19





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Shareholders’ Equity (Deficit)





	20





	 


	 






	Consolidated Statements of Cash Flows





	21





	 


	 






	Notes to the Consolidated Financial Statements





	22







	 







	 



	16



	 












	 




Click to enlarge







	 











	REPORT
	OF INDEPENDENT REGISTERED PUBLIC ACCOUNTING FIRM






	 




	To
	the Board of Directors




	Goliath
	Film & Media Holdings




	 




	We
	have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Goliath Film & Media Holdings (the Company) as of April 30, 2016
	and 2015 and the related consolidated statements of operations, stockholders’ equity (deficit), and cash flows for each
	of the years in the two year period ended April 30, 2016. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company’s
	management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audits.




	 




	We
	conducted our audits in accordance with the standards of the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States). Those
	standards require that we plan and perform the audits to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the consolidated financial
	statements are free of material misstatement. The Company is not required to have, nor were we engaged to perform, an audit of
	its internal control over financial reporting. Our audits included consideration of internal control over financial reporting
	as a basis for designing audit procedures that are appropriate in the circumstances, but not for the purpose of expressing an
	opinion on the effectiveness of the Company’s internal control over financial reporting. Accordingly, we express no such
	opinion. An audit also includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements,
	assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial
	statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.




	 




	In
	our opinion the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Goliath
	Film & Media Holdings as of April 30, 2016 and 2015, and the results of their operations and cash flows for each of the years
	in the two year period ended April 30, 2016, in conformity with U.S. generally accepted accounting principles.




	 




	The
	accompanying financial statements have been prepared assuming that the Company will continue as a going concern. As discussed
	in Note 3 to the consolidated financial statements, the Company does not have significant cash or other current assets, nor does
	it have an established source of revenues sufficient to cover its operating costs as of April 30, 2016 which raises substantial
	doubt about its ability to continue as a going concern. Management’s plans concerning these matters are also described in
	Note 3. The financial statements do not include any adjustments that might result from the outcome of this uncertainty.











	 








	/s/
	Sadler, Gibb & Associates, LLC





	 






	 




	 






	Salt
	Lake City, UT




	 






	November
	30, 2016




	 






	 




Click to enlarge




	 







	 



	17



	 












	 








	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS








	CONSOLIDATED
	BALANCE SHEETS





	 





	 


	 


	APRIL 30,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	ASSETS


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash


	 


	$


	25,310


	 


	 


	$


	579


	 




	Prepaid expense


	 


	 


	299


	 


	 


	 


	299


	 




	Total current assets


	 


	 


	25,609


	 


	 


	 


	878


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Long-term assets


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other assets


	 


	 


	15,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Film production costs


	 


	 


	315,907


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total long-term assets


	 


	 


	330,907


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total assets


	 


	$


	356,516


	 


	 


	$


	878


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	LIABILITIES AND STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (DEFICIT)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current liabilities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable and accrued expenses


	 


	$


	47,186


	 


	 


	$


	30,385


	 




	Accounts payable - related party


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	9,000


	 




	Line of credit


	 


	 


	20,887


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total current liabilities


	 


	 


	68,073


	 


	 


	 


	39,385


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Long-term liabilities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Advances for film production


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total long-term liabilities


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total liabilities


	 


	 


	168,073


	 


	 


	 


	39,385


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Stockholders’ equity (deficit)


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Preferred stock, $0.001 par value, 1,000,000 shares authorized; no shares issued and outstanding at April 30, 2016 and 2015


	 


	 


	- 


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common stock, $0.001 par value, 300,000,000 shares authorized; 158,213,917 and 138,964,917 shares issued and outstanding, at April 30, 2016 and 2015, respectively


	 


	 


	158,214


	 


	 


	 


	138,965


	 




	Additional paid in capital


	 


	 


	624,741


	 


	 


	 


	451,500


	 




	Accumulated deficit


	 


	 


	(594,512


	)


	 


	 


	(628,972


	)




	Total stockholders’ equity (deficit)


	 


	 


	188,443


	 


	 


	 


	(38,507


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total liabilities and stockholders’ equity (deficit)


	 


	$


	356,516


	 


	 


	$


	878


	 






	 




	See
	accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.




	 







	 



	18



	 











	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS








	CONSOLIDATED
	STATEMENTS OF OPERATIONS






	 






	 


	 


	For the Year Ended,


	 




	 


	 


	April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	April 30, 2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Film production revenues


	 


	$


	175,000


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 




	Cost of sales


	 


	 


	83,075


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Gross profit


	 


	 


	91,925


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Operating Expenses


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Sales and marketing


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	28,245


	 




	General and administrative


	 


	 


	56,145


	 


	 


	 


	244,934


	 




	Total operating expenses


	 


	 


	56,145


	 


	 


	 


	273,179


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Income (loss) from operations


	 


	 


	35,780


	 


	 


	 


	(273,179


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Other expense


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(4,796


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total other expense


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(4,796


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Income (loss) before income taxes


	 


	 


	35,780


	 


	 


	 


	(277,975


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Provision for income taxes


	 


	 


	(1,320


	)


	 


	 


	(840


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	34,460


	 


	 


	$


	(278,815


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net loss per share of common stock:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Basic and diluted


	 


	$


	(0.00


	)


	 


	$


	(0.00


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Weighted average shares


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Outstanding-Basic and diluted


	 


	 


	148,119,227


	 


	 


	 


	133,069,779


	 






	 




	See
	accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.




	 







	 



	19



	 











	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS








	CONSOLIDATED
	STATEMENT OF STOCKHOLDERS’ EQUITY (DEFICIT)












	 






	 


	 


	Common Stock


	 


	 


	Additional Paid


	 


	 


	Accumulated


	 


	 


	Total


	 




	 


	 


	Shares


	 


	 


	Amount


	 


	 


	in Capital


	 


	 


	Deficit


	 


	 


	Capital


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Balances, April 30, 2014


	 


	 


	93,361,667


	 


	 


	$


	93,362


	 


	 


	$


	224,738


	 


	 


	$


	(350,157


	)


	 


	$


	(32,057


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of shares – services


	 


	 


	34,000,000


	 


	 


	 


	34,000


	 


	 


	 


	102,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	136,000


	 




	Issuance of shares – private placement


	 


	 


	11,603,250


	 


	 


	 


	11,603


	 


	 


	 


	124,762


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	136,365


	 




	Net loss, year ended April 30, 2015


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	(278,815


	)


	 


	 


	(278,815


	)




	Balances, April 30, 2015


	 


	 


	138,964,917


	 


	 


	$


	138,965


	 


	 


	$


	451,500


	 


	 


	$


	(628,972


	)


	 


	$


	(38,507


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Issuance of shares – private placement


	 


	 


	19,249,000


	 


	 


	 


	19,249


	 


	 


	 


	173,241


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	192,490


	 




	Net profit, year ended April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	34,460


	 


	 


	 


	34,460


	 




	Balances, April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	158,213,917


	 


	 


	$


	158,214


	 


	 


	$


	624,741


	 


	 


	$


	(594,512


	)


	 


	$


	188,443


	 





	 



	See
	accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements.




	 







	 



	20



	 













	 








	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS








	CONSOLIDATED
	STATEMENTS OF CASH FLOWS






	 






	 


	 


	For the Year Ended


	 




	 


	 


	April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	April 30, 2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from operating activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net income (loss)


	 


	$


	34,460


	 


	 


	$


	(278,815


	)




	Adjustments to reconcile net income (loss) to net cash used in operating activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Amortization of prepaid expenses


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	136,000


	 




	Changes in operating assets and liabilities:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Film production costs


	 


	 


	(315,907


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Prepaid assets


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	4,786


	 




	Accounts payable and accrued expenses


	 


	 


	16,801


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Accounts payable – related party


	 


	 


	(9,000


	)


	 


	 


	4,137


	 




	Advances for film production


	 


	 


	100,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Net cash used in operating activities


	 


	 


	(173,646


	)


	 


	 


	(133,892


	)




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from investing activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Investment in films


	 


	 


	(15,000


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Net cash used in investing activities


	 


	 


	(15,000


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash flows from financing activities


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Proceeds from issuance of common stock


	 


	 


	192,490


	 


	 


	 


	136,365


	 




	Line of credit


	 


	 


	20,887


	 


	 


	 


	(1,894


	)




	Proceeds from notes payable


	 


	 


	25,000


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Repayment of notes payable


	 


	 


	(25,000


	)


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Net cash provided by financing activities


	 


	 


	213,377


	 


	 


	 


	134,471


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net change in cash


	 


	 


	24,731


	 


	 


	 


	579


	 




	Cash at beginning of period


	 


	 


	579


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Cash at end of period


	 


	$


	25,310


	 


	 


	$


	579


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental Disclosure of cash flow information


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Cash paid for interest


	 


	$


	-  


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 




	Cash paid for taxes


	 


	 


	519


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Supplemental Disclosure of cash flow Information:


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Common stock issued for prepaid services


	 


	$


	-  


	 


	 


	$


	136,000


	 






	 




	See
	accompanying notes to consolidated financial statements




	 







	 



	21



	 













	 












	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS










	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015












	 






	NOTE
	1 – NATURE OF OPERATIONS AND SUMMARY OF SIGNIFICANT ACCOUNTING POLICIES






	 





	On
	October 31, 2011 (the “Closing Date”), China Advanced Technology (an entity formed on February 16, 2010 in the State
	of Nevada) acquired Goliath Film and Media International, a California corporation, by issuing 47,000,000 shares of its Common
	Stock, constituting 70.1% of the outstanding shares after giving effect to their issuance and the cancellation of 15,619,816 shares
	held by China Advanced Technology’s prior control person. Immediately following the Closing, 67,100,000 shares were issued
	and outstanding. On the Closing Date, the name of China Advanced Technology was changed to Goliath Film and Media Holdings (“Goliath”
	or “the Company”). All share numbers herein have been adjusted for an eight-for-1 forward stock split affected as
	of the Closing Date. The forward stock split was reflected in the trading market on February 13, 2012. The transaction was accounted
	for as a reverse acquisition in which Goliath Film and Media International is deemed to be the accounting acquirer, and the prior
	operations of Goliath (formerly China Advanced Technology) are consolidated for accounting purposes. Since Goliath had no operations,
	assets, or liabilities as of the Closing, no audit of that entity was required under the materiality thresholds of Regulation
	S-X Rule 8-04.




	 





	Organization,
	Nature of Business and Trade Name





	 




	The
	Company is engaged in the production and distribution of motion pictures and television content. The Company has begun to realize
	revenues from its planned principal business purpose.




	 





	Principles
	of Consolidation





	 




	The
	accompanying consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its subsidiaries. All intercompany accounts
	and transactions have been eliminated.




	 





	Basis
	of Presentation





	 




	The
	preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
	requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities at the date of
	the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenue and expenses during the reported period. Actual results could differ
	from those estimates. Management further acknowledges that it is solely responsible for adopting sound accounting practices, establishing
	and maintaining a system of internal accounting control and preventing and detecting fraud. The Company’s system of internal
	accounting control is designed to assure, among other items, that (1) recorded transactions are valid; (2) all valid transactions
	are recorded and (3) transactions are recorded in the period in a timely manner to produce financial statements which present
	fairly the financial condition, results of operations and cash flows of the company for the respective periods being presented.




	 





	Use
	of Estimates





	 




	The
	preparation of financial statements in accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management
	to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and disclosure of contingent assets
	and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting
	period. A change in managements’ estimates or assumptions could have a material impact on the Company’s financial
	condition and results of operations during the period in which such changes occurred.




	 




	Actual
	results could differ from those estimates. The Company’s financial statements reflect all adjustments that management believes
	are necessary for the fair presentation of their financial condition and results of operations for the periods presented.




	 





	Cash
	and Cash Equivalents





	 




	For
	purposes of the statement of cash flows, the Company considers all highly liquid debt instruments purchased with a maturity of
	three months or less to be cash equivalents.



	 






	 



	22



	 












	 





	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015




	 




	Accounts
	Receivable





	 




	Accounts
	receivable, if any are carried at the expected net realizable value. The allowance for doubtful accounts, when determined, will
	be based on management’s assessment of the collectability of specific customer accounts and the aging of the accounts receivables.
	If there were a deterioration of a major customer’s creditworthiness, or actual defaults were higher than historical experience,
	our estimates of the recoverability of the amounts due to us could be overstated, which could have a negative impact on operations.




	 




	The
	Company currently does not have any accounts receivable. The above accounting policies will be adopted upon the Company carrying
	accounts receivable.




	 





	Intangible
	Assets





	 




	The
	Company’s intangible assets consist of intellectual property, principally motion pictures. The Company periodically reviews
	its long lived assets to ensure that their carrying value does not exceed their fair market value. There was no amortization expense
	or impairment for the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015.




	 





	Films
	and Televisions Costs





	 




	The
	Company capitalizes production costs for films produced in accordance with ASC 926-20, “Entertainment-Films - Other Assets
	- Film Costs”. Accordingly, production costs are capitalized at actual cost and then charged against revenue quarterly as
	a cost of production based on the relative fair value of the film(s) delivered and recognized as revenue. The Company evaluates
	its capitalized production costs annually and limits recorded amounts by its ability to recover such costs through expected future
	sales.




	 





	Revenue
	Recognition





	 




	We
	will recognize revenues in accordance with ASC 926-605, “Entertainment Films, Revenue Recognition”.




	 




	Under
	ASC 926-605, five conditions must be met before revenue can be recognized: (i) there is persuasive evidence that an arrangement
	exists, (ii) the film is complete and has been delivered, (iii) the license period has begun, (iv) the price is fixed or determinable,
	and (v) collection is reasonably assured. The Company provides for an allowance for doubtful account based history and experience
	considering economic and industry trends. The Company does not have any off-Balance Sheet exposure related to its customers.




	 




	The
	Company recognizes revenue when the distributor confirms to the Company that the film has been delivered to the distributor with
	all technical and document deliveries received, waived or deferred and the film has been entered into the distributor’s
	rights system.




	 





	Advertising





	 




	Advertising
	expenses are recorded as general and administrative expenses when they are incurred. Advertising expense was $0 and $1,404, for
	the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015, respectively.




	 





	Research
	and Development





	 




	All
	research and development costs are expensed as incurred. There was no research and development expense for the years ended April
	30, 2016 and 2015.




	 





	Income
	tax





	 




	We
	account for income taxes under the Financial Accounting Standards Board (“FASB”) Accounting Standards Codification
	(“ASC”) No. 740, Income Taxes (“ASC 740”). Under ASC 740, deferred tax assets and liabilities are recognized
	for the future tax consequences attributable to differences between the financial statement carrying amounts of existing assets
	and liabilities and their respective tax bases. Deferred tax assets and liabilities are measured using enacted tax rates expected
	to apply to taxable income in the years in which those temporary differences are expected to be recovered or settled. Under ASC
	740, the effect on deferred tax assets and liabilities of a change in tax rates is recognized in income in the period that includes
	the enactment date.




	 







	 



	23



	 













	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015






	 






	Fair
	Value of Financial Instruments





	 




	The
	Company follows the provisions of ASC 820. This Topic defines fair value, establishes a measurement framework and expands disclosures
	about fair value measurements.




	 




	The
	Company uses fair value measurements for determining the valuation of derivative financial instruments payable in shares of its
	common stock. This primarily involves option pricing models that incorporate certain assumptions and projections to determine
	fair value. These require management’s judgment.





	 






	Fair
	Value Measurements






	 





	Effective
	beginning second quarter 2010, the FASB ASC Topic 825,

	Financial Instruments

	, requires disclosures about fair value of
	financial instruments in quarterly reports as well as in annual reports. For the Company, this statement applies to certain investments
	and long-term debt. Also, the FASB ASC Topic 820,

	Fair Value Measurements and Disclosures

	, clarifies the definition of
	fair value for financial reporting, establishes a framework for measuring fair value and requires additional disclosures about
	the use of fair value measurements.




	 




	Various
	inputs are considered when determining the value of the Company’s investments and long-term debt. The inputs or methodologies
	used for valuing securities are not necessarily an indication of the risk associated with investing in these securities. These
	inputs are summarized in the three broad levels listed below.




	 




	●	Level
	1 – observable market inputs that are unadjusted quoted prices for identical assets or liabilities in active markets.




	 




	●	Level
	2 – other significant observable inputs (including quoted prices for similar securities, interest rates, credit risk, etc.).




	 




	●	Level
	3 – significant unobservable inputs (including the Company’s own assumptions in determining the fair value of investments).




	 




	The
	Company’s adoption of FASB ASC Topic 825 did not have a material impact on the Company’s consolidated financial statements.




	 




	The
	carrying value of financial assets and liabilities recorded at fair value is measured on a recurring or nonrecurring basis. Financial
	assets and liabilities measured on a non-recurring basis are those that are adjusted to fair value when a significant event occurs.
	The Company had no financial assets or liabilities carried and measured on a nonrecurring basis during the reporting periods.
	Financial assets and liabilities measured on a recurring basis are those that are adjusted to fair value each time a financial
	statement is prepared. The Company had no financial assets and/or liabilities carried at fair value on a recurring basis at April
	30, 2016, assets and liabilities approximate fair value due to their short term nature.




	 




	The
	availability of inputs observable in the market varies from instrument to instrument and depends on a variety of factors including
	the type of instrument, whether the instrument is actively traded, and other characteristics particular to the transaction. For
	many financial instruments, pricing inputs are readily observable in the market, the valuation methodology used is widely accepted
	by market participants, and the valuation does not require significant management discretion. For other financial instruments,
	pricing inputs are less observable in the market and may require management judgment. As of April 30, 2016, the Company had no
	assets other than prepaid expenses and capitalized film production costs.




	 





	Basic
	and diluted earnings per share





	 




	Basic
	earnings per share are based on the weighted-average number of shares of common stock outstanding. Diluted Earnings per share
	is based on the weighted-average number of shares of common stock outstanding adjusted for the effects of common stock that may
	be issued as a result of the following types of potentially dilutive instruments:




	 







	 



	24



	 











	 




	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015





	 





	 



	●




	Warrants,





	 



	 




	 





	 



	●




	Employee
	stock options, and





	 



	 




	 





	 



	●




	Other
	equity awards, which include long-term incentive awards.






	 




	The
	FASB ASC Topic 260,

	Earnings Per Share

	, requires the Company to include additional shares in the computation of earnings
	per share, assuming dilution.




	 




	Diluted
	earnings per share is based on the assumption that all dilutive options were converted or exercised. Dilution is computed by applying
	the treasury stock method. Under this method, options are assumed to be exercised at the time of issuance, and as if funds obtained
	thereby were used to purchase common stock at the average market price during the period.




	 




	Basic
	and diluted earnings per share are the same as there were no potentially dilutive instruments for the years ended April 30, 2016
	and 2015.




	 





	Concentrations,
	Risks, and Uncertainties





	 




	The
	Company did not have a concentration of business with suppliers or customers constituting greater than 10% of the Company’s
	gross sales during 2016 and 2015.




	 





	Stock
	Based Compensation





	 




	In
	accordance with ASC No. 718,

	Compensation – Stock Compensation

	(“ASC 718”), we measure the compensation
	costs of share-based compensation arrangements based on the grant-date fair value and recognize the costs in the financial statements
	over the period during which employees are required to provide services. Share-based compensation arrangements include stock options,
	restricted share plans, performance-based awards, share appreciation rights and employee share purchase plans. As such, compensation
	cost is measured on the date of grant at their fair value. Such compensation amounts, if any, are amortized over the respective
	vesting periods of the option grant. We apply this statement prospectively. Equity instruments (“instruments”) issued
	to other than employees are recorded on the basis of the fair value of the instruments, as required by ASC 718. ASC No. 505,

	Equity
	Based Payments to Non-Employees

	(“ASC 505”) defines the measurement date and recognition period for such instruments.
	In general, the measurement date is (a) when a performance commitment, as defined, is reached or (b) when the earlier of (i) the
	non-employee performance is complete or (ii) the instruments are vested. The measured value related to the instruments is recognized
	over a period based on the facts and circumstances of each particular grant as defined in the ASC 505.




	 





	Accounting
	for Derivative Financial Instruments





	 




	We
	evaluate financial instruments using the guidance provided by ASC 815 and apply the provisions thereof to the accounting of items
	identified as derivative financial instruments not indexed to our stock.




	 





	Recently
	Enacted Accounting Standards





	 




	The
	Company does not expect the adoption of any other recent accounting pronouncements to have a material impact on its financial
	statements.




	 





	NOTE
	2 – COMMON STOCK





	 




	The
	Company has authorized 1,000,000 shares of preferred stock, $0.001 par value, with such rights, preferences and designation and
	to be issued in such series as determined by the Board of Directors. No shares of preferred stock are issued and outstanding at
	April 30, 2016 or 2015.




	 




	The
	Company has authorized 300,000,000 shares of par value $0.001 common stock, of which 158,213,917 and 138,964,917 shares are outstanding
	at April 30, 2016 and 2015, respectively.




	 




	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company entered into separate private placement memorandums with an affiliate shareholder under
	which we issued 13,249,000 shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $132,490. The issuance
	was exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investor was sophisticated and familiar
	with our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 







	 



	25



	 












	 





	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015





	 




	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company entered into a separate private placement memorandums with a third party under which
	we issued 6,000,000 shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $60,000. The issuance
	was exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investor was sophisticated and familiar
	with our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 




	During
	the year ended April 30, 2015, the Company entered into separate private placement memorandums with an affiliate shareholder under
	which we issued 11,603,250 shares of our common stock, restricted in accordance with Rule 144, in exchange for $136,365. The issuance
	was exempt from registration pursuant to Section 4(2) of the Securities Act of 1933, and the investor was sophisticated and familiar
	with our operations at the time of the issuance of the shares.




	 





	NOTE
	3 - GOING CONCERN





	 




	The
	Company’s financial statements are prepared using accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America
	applicable to a going concern, which contemplates the realization of assets and liquidation of liabilities in the normal course
	of business. However, the Company does not have significant cash or other current assets, nor does it have an established source
	of revenues sufficient to cover its operating costs, which raises substantial doubt about our ability to continue as a going concern.




	 




	Under
	the going concern assumption, an entity is ordinarily viewed as continuing in business for the foreseeable future with neither
	the intention nor the necessity of liquidation, ceasing trading, or seeking protection from creditors pursuant to laws or regulations.
	Accordingly, assets and liabilities are recorded on the basis that the entity will be able to realize its assets and discharge
	its liabilities in the normal course of business.




	 




	The
	ability of the Company to continue as a going concern is dependent upon its ability to successfully accomplish the plan described
	in the preceding paragraph and eventually attain profitable operations. The accompanying financial statements do not include any
	adjustments that may be necessary if the Company is unable to continue as a going concern.




	 




	During
	the next year, the Company’s foreseeable cash requirements will relate to continual development of the operations of its
	business, maintaining its good standing and making the requisite filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company
	may experience a cash shortfall and be required to raise additional capital.




	 




	Historically,
	the Company has relied upon internally generated funds and funds from the sale of shares of stock to finance its operations and
	growth. Management may raise additional capital through future public or private offerings of the Company’s stock or through
	loans from private investors, although there can be no assurance that it will be able to obtain such financing. The Company’s
	failure to do so could have a material and adverse effect upon its and its shareholders.




	 




	In
	the past year, the Company funded operations by using cash proceeds received through the issuance of common stock. For the coming
	year, the Company plans to continue to fund the Company through debt and securities sales and issuances, focus on a possible joint
	venture or merger until the company generates revenues through the operations of such merged company or joint venture as stated
	above.




	 





	NOTE
	4 - RELATED PARTY TRANSACTIONS






	 





	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company sold 13,249,000 restricted common shares to an affiliate shareholder pursuant to a
	private placement memorandum in exchange for $132,490.





	 





	During
	the year ended April 30, 2015, the Company sold 11,603,250 restricted common shares to an affiliate shareholder pursuant to a
	private placement memorandum in exchange for $136,365.




	 







	 



	26



	 












	 





	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015




	 



	In
	the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company paid C&R Film for capitalized film costs, consulting and reimbursement of various
	expenses $50,191, similarly the Company paid $5,450 in year ended April 30, 2015. C&R Film is controlled by Lamont Robert,
	CEO and Acting CFO of the Company.




	 




	Additionally,
	Debbie Criscione, wife of Director of the Company Mike Criscione received payments of $0 in year ended April 30, 2016 and $4,950
	in year ended April 30, 2015 for consulting and reimbursements for expenses paid on behalf of the Company.




	 




	Further,
	Mike Criscione, Director of the Company received payments of $46,145 in year ended April 30, 2016 and $10,850 in year ended April
	30, 2015 for capitalized film costs, consulting and reimbursements for expenses paid on behalf of the Company.




	 




	Additionally,
	Lamont Roberts, CEO and Acting CFO of the Company, received payments of $0 in year ended April 30, 2016 and $3,600 in year ended
	April 30, 2015 for consulting and reimbursements for expenses paid on behalf of the Company.




	 




	We
	issued 5,000,000 restricted common shares to our Chief Financial Officer pursuant to his consulting contract dated May 1, 2014.
	We also issued 2,000,000 restricted common shares for professional services per consulting contracts dated May 1, 2014.




	 




	We
	issued 2,000,000 restricted common shares to our President and Chief Executive Officer, pursuant to his consulting contract dated
	May 1, 2014. Further, we issued 25,000,000 restricted common shares to a Director of the Company and to manage sales and marketing
	activities for the Company pursuant to his consulting contract dated May 1, 2014.




	 




	Related
	party transactions have been disclosed in the other notes to these financial statements.




	 





	NOTE
	5 – INCOME TAXES





	 




	As
	of April 30, 2016, the Company had net operating loss carryforwards of approximately $595,000, which expire in varying amounts
	between 2018 and 2035. Realization of this potential future tax benefit is dependent on generating sufficient taxable income prior
	to expiration of the loss carryforward. The deferred tax asset related to this (and other) potential future tax benefits has been
	offset by a valuation allowance in the same amount. The amount of the deferred tax asset ultimately realizable could be increased
	in the near term if estimates of future taxable income during the carryforwards period are revised.




	 




	Deferred
	income tax assets of approximately $249,000 at April 30, 2016, was offset in full by a valuation allowance.




	 




	The
	approximate components of the Company’s net deferred tax assets, including a valuation allowance, are as follows:




	 







	Deferred Tax Assets


	 



	As of


	April 30, 2016



	 


	 



	As of


	April 30, 2015



	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net operating loss

	carryforwards



	 


	$


	595,000


	 


	 


	$


	629,000


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Net deferred tax assets

	before valuation allowance



	 


	 


	249,000


	 


	 


	 


	264,000


	 




	Less: Valuation allowance


	 


	 


	(249,000


	)


	 


	 


	(264,000


	)




	Net deferred tax assets


	 


	 


	0


	 


	 


	 


	0


	 






	 




	A
	reconciliation between the amounts of income tax benefit determined by applying the applicable U.S. and State statutory income
	tax rate to pre-tax loss is as follows:




	 







	 


	 


	As of

	April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	As of

	April 30, 2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Statutory federal income tax


	 


	 


	(35.0


	)%


	 


	 


	(35.0


	)%




	Statutory state income tax


	 


	 


	(6.9


	)%


	 


	 


	(6.9


	)%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Change in valuation allowance on deferred tax assets


	 


	 


	(41.9


	)%


	 


	 


	(41.9


	)%





	 






	 



	27



	 











	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015




	 






	 


	For the Years Ending


	 




	Components of Income Tax Expense


	 


	April 30, 2016


	 


	 


	April 30, 2015


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Federal U.S. Income Taxes


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Deferred


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	State Income Taxes


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Current


	 


	$


	1,320


	 


	 


	$


	840


	 




	Deferred


	 


	 


	-


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Total Income Tax Expense


	 


	$


	1,320


	 


	 


	$


	840


	 






	 




	Due
	to the inherent uncertainty in forecasts and future events and operating results, the Company has provided for a valuation allowance
	in an amount equal to gross deferred tax assets resulting in the above figures for the periods audited.





	 








	NOTE
	6 – INVESTMENT IN FILMS





	 





	 


	 


	April 30,


	 




	 


	 


	2016


	 


	 


	2015


	 




	Released, net of accumulated amortization


	 


	$


	120,781


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 




	In progress


	 


	 


	195,126


	 


	 


	 


	-


	 




	Intangible assets, net


	 


	$


	315,907


	 


	 


	$


	-


	 






	 




	Amortization
	expense was $83,075 and $0 for each of the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015, respectively, and is classified in cost of sales
	in the Statements of Operations.





	 






	NOTE
	7 – OPERATING LEASE





	 




	On
	July 1, 2014, we entered into a month to month lease for office space at location 4640 Admiralty Way, Marina del Rey, California,
	90292. The rent is $199 per month.




	 




	The
	total rent and lease expense was $2,190 and $1,642 for the years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015, respectively.




	 





	NOTE
	8 – ADVANCE FOR FILM PRODUCTION COSTS





	 




	Advance
	for film production costs represent amounts received in advance from Mar Vista Entertainment, LLC (“Mar Vista”) for
	providing film distribution rights.




	 





	NOTE
	9 – LINE OF CREDIT





	 




	The
	Company has two credit cards with a total available balance of $25,000. The credit cards are not personally guaranteed by the
	Officers and Directors of the Company nor are the credit cards guaranteed by the Company. The credit cards have an interest rate
	of 28.24 percent.




	 







	 



	28



	 
















	 





	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS






	NOTES
	TO FINANCIAL STATEMENTS






	FOR
	THE YEARS ENDED APRIL 30, 2016 AND 2015





	 





	NOTE
	10 – COMMITMENTS AND CONTINGENCIES





	 





	Production
	Agreements





	 




	On
	April, 1, 2015 Goliath signed an agreement whereby the Company agree to invest $15,000 to KKO Productions to produce a feature
	length film known as “Forgiven”. Per the agreement Goliath will receive 15% of adjusted gross proceeds after its initial
	investment has been entirely recouped through adjusted gross proceed. Additionally, the Company will receive two on screen credits
	as Executive Producer as well as receiving credit on all advertising, publicity and packaging of the film.




	 




	On
	March 4, 2016 Goliath signed a distribution agreement with Mar Vista to distribute a feature film currently in development by
	Goliath. Per the agreement, Goliath will receive $125,000 in advance payments per an agreed delivery schedule for providing distribution
	rights of the film “Bridal Boot Camp” a romantic comedy movie being produced by Goliath to Mar Vista. Additionally,
	Mar Vista will receive 35% of the gross proceeds for a period of 25 years on the film.




	 





	Legal





	 




	The
	Company is not a party to or otherwise involved in any legal proceedings.




	 




	In
	the ordinary course of business, from time to time the Company may be involved in various pending or threatened legal actions.
	The litigation process is inherently uncertain and it is possible that the resolution of such matters might have a material adverse
	effect upon the Company’s financial condition and/or results of operations. However, in the opinion of management, other
	than as set forth herein, matters currently pending or threatened against the Company are not expected to have a material adverse
	effect on its financial position or results of operations.




	 







	NOTE
	11 – SUBSEQUENT EVENTS






	 





	There
	were no events subsequent to May 1, 2016, and up to the date of this filing that would require disclosure.




	 







	 



	29



	 
















	 








	Item
	9A(T). 	CONTROLS AND PROCEDURES





	 





	Evaluation
	of Disclosure Controls and Procedures





	 





	Disclosure
	Controls and Procedures

	. We maintain disclosure controls and procedures designed to ensure that information required to be
	disclosed in our reports filed under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act), is recorded, processed,
	summarized, and reported accurately, in accordance with U.S. Generally Accepted Accounting Principles and within the required
	time periods, and that such information is accumulated and communicated to our management, including our Chief Executive Officer,
	and our Chief Financial Officer, as appropriate, to allow for timely decisions regarding disclosure. As of the end of the period
	covered by this report (April 30, 2016), we carried out an evaluation, under the supervision and with the participation of our
	management, including our Chief Executive Officer, and our Chief Financial Officer, of the effectiveness of the design and operation
	of our disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)). Based upon that evaluation,
	our Chief Executive Officer and our Chief Financial Officer concluded that as of the end of the period covered by this Annual
	Report on Form 10-K our disclosure controls and procedures were not effective to enable us to accurately record, process, summarize
	and report certain information required to be included in the Company’s periodic SEC filings within the required time periods,
	and to accumulate and communicate to our management, including the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer, to allow
	timely decisions regarding required disclosure.




	 





	Internal
	Control Over Financial Reporting.

	Our management is responsible for establishing and maintaining adequate internal control
	over financial reporting, as such term is defined in Exchange Act Rule 13a-15(f). Management conducted an evaluation of the effectiveness
	of our internal control over financial reporting based on the criteria set forth in Internal Control—Integrated Framework
	issued by the Committee of Sponsoring Organizations (“COSO”). Based upon that evaluation, our Chief Executive Officer
	and our Chief Financial Officer concluded that as of the end of the period covered by this Annual Report on Form 10-K our internal
	control over financial reporting was not effective as of the fiscal year ended April 30, 2016.




	 




	There
	were no changes in our internal control over financial reporting (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f) under the Securities
	Exchange Act of 1934) that occurred during the most recent fiscal quarter that have materially affected, or are reasonably likely
	to materially affect, our internal control over financial reporting.




	 




	This
	annual report on internal control over financial reporting does not include an attestation report of the Company’s registered
	public accounting firm pursuant to temporary rules of the Securities and Exchange Commission that permit the Company to provide
	only management’s report in this Annual Report.




	 





	Changes
	in Internal Controls





	 




	There
	have been no changes in our internal controls over financial reporting during the quarter ended April 30, 2016 that have materially
	affected or are reasonably likely to materially affect our internal controls.





	 







	Item
	9B.	OTHER INFORMATION






	 





	Not
	applicable






	 









	Item
	10.	DIRECTORS, EXECUTIVE OFFICERS, AND CORPORATE GOVERNANCE.





	 





	Directors
	and Executive Officers





	 




	The
	member of the Board of Directors of Goliath Film and Media Holdings serves until the next annual meeting of stockholders, or until
	their successors have been elected. The officer serves at the pleasure of the Board of Directors. The following are the directors
	and executive officers of Goliath Film and Media Holdings.




	 





	Lamont
	Robert, President, Chief Executive Officer and Acting Chief Financial Officer





	 




	Lamont
	Roberts, 60, has been President, Chief Executive Officer and Director of Goliath since October, 2011. In 1997 he co-founded Millennium
	Personal and Business Management Corporation with Wilt Chamberlain, representing and managing a client base comprising actors,
	athletes, directors, musicians and writers. In the late 1990s Mr. Roberts also began producing film and television projects. In
	2003, he was hired as the Executive Director of Reel Image, Inc., a content funding corporation. As the head of Reel Image, Inc.,
	he is working on distributing a documentary that he wrote and produced entitled “Chosen By God- the Great Black Pharaohs
	of the 25

	th

	Dynasty.” As an independent producer, Mr. Roberts produced the feature films “The Truth About
	Layla,” and “The Marina Murders.” He acted as an Associate Producer on the feature film “Seducing Spirits,”
	and was the executive in charge of production for the feature film “The Perfect Argument,” and the documentaries “Film
	Struggle,” and “Living with Cancer.” Mr. Roberts has a BSBA in Finance and an MA in Real Estate and Urban Economics
	from the University of Florida. He is a best-selling author and lives in Marina Del Rey, CA.




	 







	 



	30



	 












	 





	Mike
	Criscione, Director






	 





	Mike
	Criscione, 63, has been on the Board since May 1, 2014 has been a highly successful business man and real estate developer. He
	brought this extensive experience to the film business in 1991, producing “LA Goddess”. From 2008 to the present Mr.
	Criscione has directed, financed and produced numerous commercials, music videos, several motion pictures, and documentaries.
	He is a graduate of Vision Bible College in Whittier, California where he earned his Bachelor degree.




	 






	Director
	Independence






	 




	Currently,
	the Company does not have any independent directors. Since the Company’s Common Stock is not currently listed on a national
	securities exchange, we have used the definition of “independence” of The NASDAQ Stock Market to make this determination.




	 




	Under
	NASDAQ Listing Rule 5605(a)(2), an “independent director” is a “person other than an officer or employee of
	the company or any other individual having a relationship which, in the opinion of the company’s board of directors, would
	interfere with the exercise of independent judgment in carrying out the responsibilities of a director.”




	 




	We
	do not currently have a separately designated audit, nominating or compensation committee. However, we do intend to comply with
	the independent director and committee composition requirements in the future.




	 





	Limitation
	of Liability and Indemnification






	 





	Goliath’s
	Articles of Incorporation provisions may be interpreted to provide for the indemnification of officers and directors for certain
	civil liabilities, including liabilities arising under the Securities Act. In the opinion of the Securities and Exchange Commission,
	such indemnification is against public policy as expressed in the Securities Act and is, therefore, unenforceable.




	 





	Code
	of Ethics





	 




	Goliath
	Film and Media Holdings has not adopted a code of ethics which applies to the chief executive officer, chief operating officer
	and chief financial officer, because of our level of operations of the public entity in 2016.




	 




	Audit
	Committee Financial Expert




	 




	Goliath
	Film and Media Holdings does not have either an Audit Committee or a financial expert on the Board of Directors. The Board of
	Directors believes that obtaining the services of an audit committee financial expert is not economically rational at this time
	in light of the costs associated with identifying and retaining an individual who would qualify as an audit committee financial
	expert, the limited scope of our operations and the relative simplicity of our financial statements and accounting procedures.




	 




	Section
	16(a) Beneficial Ownership Reporting Compliance




	 




	Section
	16(a) of the Exchange Act requires Goliath Film and Media Holdings officers, directors and persons who own more than ten percent
	of a registered class of our equity securities to file reports of ownership and changes in ownership with the SEC. Officers, directors
	and ten percent stockholders are required by regulation to furnish Goliath Film and Media Holdings with copies of all Section
	16(a) forms they file. The Company’s common stock did not become registered under the Exchange Act until after the year
	ended April 30, 2012, so Section 16(a) is not applicable to the Company.




	 







	 



	31



	 














	 








	Item
	11.	EXECUTIVE COMPENSATION





	 




	The
	following table sets forth the compensation of the Company’s sole executive officer for the years ended April 30, 2016,
	2015, and 2014.




	 







	SUMMARY COMPENSATION TABLE




	 




	Name and Principal Position (a)


	 


	Year (b)


	 


	 



	Salary ($) (c)



	 


	 


	 



	Bonus ($) (d)



	 


	 


	 



	Stock Awards ($) (e)



	 


	 


	 



	Option Awards  ($) (f)



	 


	 


	 



	Non-Equity Incentive Plan Compensation ($) (g)



	 


	 


	 



	Nonqualified Deferred Compensation Earnings ($) (h)



	 


	 


	 



	All Other Compensation ($) (i)



	 


	 


	 



	Total ($) (j)



	 




	Lemont

	Roberts, CEO and PRES.


	 


	2016

	2015

	2014


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	5,450




	2,000




	 


	 


	 




	0




	5,450




	2,000




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Mike

	Criscione, DIRECTOR




	2016

	2015

	2014


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 






	0




	10,850




	25,000 




	 








	0




	10,850




	25,000




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Kaila

	Criscione, COO


	 


	2015

	2014


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	 




	0




	0




	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	John

	Ballard



	 


	2015

	2014


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	0




	 


	 


	 




	0




	5,000




	 


	 


	 




	0




	5,000




	 






	 




	Mr.
	Ballard received 5,000,000 restricted common shares pursuant to his consulting contract dated May 1, 2014 and expiring May 1,
	2015. The Chief Financial Officer elected to not renew the contract and resigned effective May 1, 2015.




	 




	Mr.
	Roberts received 2,000,000 restricted common shares pursuant to his consulting contract dated May 1, 2014. The employment contract
	has not been renewed and is on a month to month basis.




	 




	Mr.
	Criscione received 25,000,000 restricted common shares as a Director of the Company and to manage sales and marketing activities
	for the Company pursuant to his consulting contract dated May 1, 2014. The consulting contract expired May 1, 2015. The consulting
	contract has not been renewed and is on a month to month basis.




	 




	Mr.
	Roberts received 6,000,000 shares per his employment contract in May 2012 for service valued at $6,000 or $3,000 per year expiring
	May 2014. There is no other cash or non-cash compensation paid to Mr. Roberts.




	 




	Ms.
	Criscione received 10,000,000 shares per her employment contract in May 2012 for service valued at $10,000 or $5,000 per year
	expiring May 2014. There is no other cash or non-cash compensation paid to Ms. Criscione. Ms. Criscione resigned from the Company
	on May 1, 2014.




	 




	Mr.
	Ballard received 5,138,889 shares per his employment contract in May 2012 for service valued at $5,139 or $2,570 per year expiring
	May 2014. Mr. Ballard also received $9,000 in cash in the year ending April 2012. There is no other cash or non-cash compensation
	paid to Mr. Ballard.




	 




	Ms.
	Criscione resigned from the Company on May 1, 2014




	 







	 



	32



	 












	 




	No
	amounts are paid or payable to directors for acting as such.




	 





	Employment
	Agreements with Executive Officers





	 




	We
	do have any employment agreements with our executive officers at this present time.




	 





	Director
	Compensation





	 




	Currently
	our directors serve without compensation.





	 







	Item
	12.	SECURITY OWNERSHIP OF CERTAIN BENEFICIAL OWNERS AND MANAGEMENT AND RELATED STOCKHOLDER MATTERS.





	 




	The
	following table sets forth information relating to the beneficial ownership of Company common stock as of July 1, 2012 by (i)
	each person known by Goliath Film and Media Holdings to be the beneficial owner of more than 5% of the outstanding shares of common
	stock (ii) each of Goliath Film and Media Holdings directors and executive officers, and (iii) the Percentage After Offering assumes
	the sale of all shares offered. Unless otherwise noted below, Goliath Film and Media Holdings believes that all persons named
	in the table have sole voting and investment power with respect to all shares of common stock beneficially owned by them. For
	purposes hereof, a person is deemed to be the beneficial owner of securities that can be acquired by such person within 60 days
	from the date hereof upon the exercise of warrants or options or the conversion of convertible securities. Each beneficial owner’s
	percentage ownership is determined by assuming that any warrants, options or convertible securities that are held by such person
	(but not those held by any other person) and which are exercisable within 60 days from the date hereof, have been exercised.





	 





	Beneficial
	ownership is determined in accordance with SEC rules and generally includes voting or investment power with respect to the shares.
	We had 158,213,917 shares outstanding as of November 1, 2016.




	 







	Name


	 


	Office


	 


	Number of Common Shares Owned


	 


	 


	Percentage of Shares Owned


	 




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Lamont Roberts


	 


	Chief Executive Officer


	 


	 



	15,000,000





	(1)


	 


	 


	9.5


	%




	Mike Criscione


	 


	Director


	 


	 


	25,166,000


	 


	 


	 


	15.9


	%




	John Ballard


	 


	Chief Financial Officer


	 


	 


	10,394,445


	(3)


	 


	 


	6.6


	%




	Kaila Criscione


	 


	Chief Operating Officer


	 


	 


	30,000,000


	(2)


	 


	 


	19.0


	%




	Kevin Frawley


	 


	none


	 


	 



	48,797,917



	(1)


	 


	 


	30.8


	%




	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 


	 




	Total officer/director/5% owners


	 


	 


	 


	 


	129,358,362


	 


	 


	 


	81.8


	%






	 






	(1)




	Mr.
	Frawley has granted to Lamont Roberts all rights to vote and direct the disposition of 20,000,000 shares held of record by
	Mr. Frawley.






	(2)




	Ms.
	Criscione resigned from the Company on May 1, 2014.






	(3)




	John
	Ballard resigned from the Company on May 1, 2015.







	 







	Item
	13.	CERTAIN RELATIONSHIPS AND RELATED TRANSACTIONS, AND DIRECTOR INDEPENDENCE





	 




	During
	the year ended April 30, 2016, the Company sold 13,249,000 restricted common shares to an affiliate shareholder pursuant to a
	private placement memorandum in exchange for $132,490.




	 




	During
	the year ended April 30, 2015, the Company sold 11,603,250 restricted common shares to an affiliate shareholder pursuant to a
	private placement memorandum in exchange for $136,365.




	 




	The
	Chief Financial Officer received a total of 5,000,000 shares with a consulting contract expiring May 1, 2014. In addition, the
	individual providing accounting services received 500,000 restricted common shares with a contract expiring on May 1, 2014.




	 







	 



	33



	 












	 






	Director
	Independence






	 




	Currently,
	the Company does not have any independent directors. Since the Company’s Common Stock is not currently listed on a national
	securities exchange, we have used the definition of “independence” of The NASDAQ Stock Market to make this determination.




	 




	Under
	NASDAQ Listing Rule 5605(a)(2), an “independent director” is a “person other than an officer or employee of
	the company or any other individual having a relationship which, in the opinion of the company’s board of directors, would
	interfere with the exercise of independent judgment in carrying out the responsibilities of a director.”




	 




	We
	do not currently have a separately designated audit, nominating or compensation committee. However, we do intend to comply with
	the independent director and committee composition requirements in the future.





	 







	Item
	14.	PRINCIPAL ACCOUNTANT FEES AND SERVICES.





	 





	Audit
	Fees





	 




	During
	the period covering the fiscal years ended April 30, 2016 and 2015, our principal accounting firm Sadler Gibb & Associates
	was paid $9,500 in 2016 and $9,500 in 2015 for audit and review work.




	 





	Tax
	Fees





	 




	None.




	 





	All
	Other Fees





	 




	None.




	 




	Audit
	Committees pre-approval policies and procedures




	 




	We
	do not have an audit committee. Our engagement of Sadler and Gibb as our independent registered public accounting firm was approved
	by the Board of Directors.






	 







	PART
	IV





	 







	Item
	15. EXHIBITS AND FINANCIAL STATEMENT SCHEDULES





	 




	(a)
	Financial Statements. All Financial Statements are listed in Item 7. No schedules are required.




	 




	(b)
	Exhibits. The following exhibits of the Company are included herein.




	 







	 




	Number




	 




	Description






	 



	3.1



	 



	Articles
	of Incorporation (1)





	 



	3.2



	 



	Articles
	of Merger with China Advanced Technologies Corporation (1)





	 



	3.3



	 



	Bylaws
	(1)





	 



	31.1



	 



	Certification
	of Chief Executive and Financial Officer pursuant to Exchange Act Rule 13a-14(a)(2)





	 



	32.1



	 



	Certification
	of Chief Executive and Financial Officer pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350(2).







	 




	(1)
	Incorporated by reference with the exhibit so numbered in the Company’s Registration Statement on Form S-1, file number
	333-169212.




	(2)
	Filed herewith.




	 







	 



	34



	 















	 








	SIGNATURES





	 




	Pursuant
	to the requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the Registrant has duly caused this report
	to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized on December 1, 2016.




	 






	GOLIATH
	FILM AND MEDIA HOLDINGS




	 




	 






	 




	 




	 






	 




	By:






	/s/
	Lamont Roberts








	 




	 




	Lamont
	Roberts






	 




	 




	Chief
	Executive Officer, President and acting






	 




	 




	Chief
	Financial Officer






	 




	 




	 






	 




	By:





	/s/
	Mike Criscione







	 




	 




	Mike
	Criscione






	 




	 




	Director






	 







	 



	35



	 






















	 



	EXHIBIT 31.1




	 






	SECTION 302 CERTIFICATION



	 


	I, Lamont Roberts, certify that:


	 


	1. I have reviewed this annual report on Form
	10-K of Goliath Film and Media Holdings;


	 


	2. Based on my knowledge, this report does
	not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary to make the statements made, in
	light of the circumstances under which such statements were made, not misleading with respect to the period covered by this report;


	 


	3. Based on my knowledge, the financial statements,
	and other financial information included in this report, fairly present in all material respects the financial condition, results
	of operations and cash flows of the registrant as of, and for, the periods presented in this report;


	 


	4. I am responsible for establishing and maintaining
	disclosure controls and procedures (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(e) and 15d-15(e)) and internal control over financial
	reporting (as defined in Exchange Act Rules 13a-15(f) and 15d-15(f)) for the registrant and have:


	 


	a) Designed such disclosure controls and procedures,
	or caused such disclosure controls and procedures to be designed under our supervision, to ensure that material information relating
	to the registrant, including its consolidated subsidiaries, is made known to us by others within those entities, particularly during
	the period in which this report is being prepared;


	 


	b) Designed such internal control over financial
	reporting, or caused such internal control over financial reporting to be designed under our supervision, to provide reasonable
	assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in
	accordance with generally accepted accounting principles;


	 


	c) Evaluated the effectiveness of the registrant’s
	disclosure controls and procedures and presented in this report our conclusions about the effectiveness of the disclosure controls
	and procedures, as of the end of the period covered by this report based on such evaluation; and


	 


	d) Disclosed in this report any change in the
	registrant’s internal control over financial reporting that occurred during the registrant’s most recent fiscal quarter
	(the registrant’s fourth fiscal quarter in the case of an annual report) that has materially affected, or is reasonably likely
	to materially affect, the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting; and


	 


	5. I have disclosed, based on our most recent
	evaluation of internal control over financial reporting, to the registrant’s auditors and the audit committee of the registrant’s
	board of directors (or persons performing the equivalent functions):


	 


	a) All significant deficiencies and material
	weaknesses in the design or operation of internal control over financial reporting which are reasonably likely to adversely affect
	the registrant’s ability to record, process, summarize and report financial information; and


	 


	b) Any fraud, whether or not material, that
	involves management or other employees who have a significant role in the registrant’s internal control over financial reporting.


	 


	Date: December 1, 2016


	 






	/s/ Lamont Roberts




	 





	Lamont Roberts



	 





	Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer



	 





	 






	 





















	 



	EXHIBIT 32.1



	 





	CERTIFICATION PURSUANT TO 18 U.S.C. SECTION
	1350, AS ADOPTED



	 



	PURSUANT TO SECTION 906 OF THE SARBANES-OXLEY
	ACT OF 2002



	 


	In connection with the Annual Report of Reign
	Sapphire Corporation (the “Company”) on Form 10-K for the year ended April 30, 2016 as filed with the Securities and
	Exchange Commission on the date hereof (the “Report”), I, Lamont Roberts, Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial
	Officer of the Company, certify, pursuant to 18 U.S.C. Section 1350, as adopted pursuant to Section 906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act
	of 2002, to the best of my knowledge, that:


	 


	(1) The Report fully complies with the requirements
	of Section 13(a) or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; and


	 


	(2) The information contained in the Report
	fairly presents, in all material respects, the financial condition and results of operations of the Company for the dates and periods
	covered by the Report.


	 


	This certificate is being made for the exclusive
	purpose of compliance by the Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer of the Company with the requirements of Section
	906 of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, and may not be disclosed, distributed or used by any person or for any reason other than
	as specifically required by law.


	 






	/s/ Lamont Roberts




	 





	Lamont Roberts



	 





	Chief Executive Officer and Chief Financial Officer



	 




	 


	 





	December 1, 2016



	 





	 






	 

















